Rank	Club_Name	location	capacity	Website	text
1	Hï Ibiza	Ibiza, Spain	5,692	hiibiza.com	What makes a great club? Show-stopping line-ups plucking from the most exciting talent of the day, mixing big-room headliners and emerging names? Pin-point-perfect audio in every corner? What about mind-blowing lighting to transport crowds into the stratosphere? And a labyrinthine layout hiding weird and wonderful elements in which to get lost, or find a pack of new friends. Maybe, it’s all of the above. First opening doors onto Ibiza’s legendary Playa d’en Bossa strip in 2017, Hï Ibiza’s inaugural two seasons catapulted the address toward the pinnacle of DJ Mag’s Top 100 Clubs poll. For the past three years, the venue has stood at the summit of this annual list. A non-mover now ranking at No. 1 so consistently it’s getting harder and harder to work out what hasn’t already been said about the fabled institute. World’s most technologically advanced dance music destination: check. Home to the White Isle’s premier-league residencies: done. A marvel of nightlife design: read it before. Any attempt to define why Hï Ibiza continues to prove so perennially popular should probably start by talking about the layout. Take the Theatre, for example. A main room inspired by Italian amphitheatres with a VIP terrace surrounding the dancefloor, here, a huge LED screen creates a fully immersive experience as sonic drama blasts from the powerhouse L-Acoustics rig. One of the finest sounding things we’ve been lucky enough to experience, lasers, confetti cannons, and CO2 jets heighten the impact of every drop, breakdown and rolling drum those speakers emit. In contrast, the Club Room feels squarely aimed at the heads — a darker, smaller, lower-ceilinged enclave where the DJ booth sits at eye level and there are far less distractions. A venue within the venue focusing firmly on the music, effects are used to emphasise and accentuate, rather than create awe-inspiring visual spectaculars.For many, though, The Wild Corner is actually Hï Ibiza’s hidden highlight, a unisex bathroom with CDJs, mixer and a ceiling illuminated in vivid colours. It’s serious yet fun, or maybe that should just be seriously fun.Back outside, The Magic Garden and Secret Garden provide respite from the chaos, places to kick back, relax and talk nonsense to anyone who will listen. Ethereal installations and luxurious teepees set the tone for these chillout oases.Each of these areas will make a huge impression in their own right, but arguably it’s the way every element of the complex can be fine-tuned to suit any event that guarantees so many returning visitors. Whatever the night, whoever is playing, things will look distinct compared to 24 hours earlier.“Our goal is always to create the best experience possible. We put our heart and soul into making every aspect of our events special, but the key element has and always will always be our guests. Without their continued support none of this would be possible. Taking the No. 1 spot in the DJ Mag Top 100 Clubs poll was a dream from the beginning, so to have been awarded the accolade for three years in a row feels incredible,”  says Yann Pissenem, founder, CEO and owner of Ushuaïa Entertainment, Ushuaïa Ibiza and Hï Ibiza. “Alongside our incredible family of headline residents, and world-first debuts from pioneering artists, this year clubbers will be able to explore the multi-room experience like never before as we embrace new technologies and showcase cutting-edge production, ensuring Ibiza’s legacy as one of the top clubbing destinations in the world.”So, what does that really mean for the standard bearer? 2024 will be the venue’s longest season to date, although in many ways much is the same. Hï Ibiza remains shorthand for a one-of-a-kind 360 nightlife experience unlike anything else on the island. It still means expertly programmed sessions led by extraordinary selectors, graced by groundbreaking guests. Impromptu back-to-back sets will continue to bring unforgettable surprises. And the beloved sessions and artists who call this place home are back, for good reason. Like Black Coffee and his sell-out soirée, and Afterlife, where Tale of Us’ melodic grooves form ethereal moments heightened by breathtaking imagery.David Guetta & MORTEN’s aptly-named Future Rave is also here again, marrying main stage tunes and warehouse noises with surrealist eye-candy. Glitterbox’s colourful, unabashed celebration of upfront house and disco is another contrast. Meanwhile, Eric Prydz will present a newly updated take on his legendary A/V displays, this time known as [CELL]. Whichever you hit — The Martinez Brothers or FISHER — the venue will be transformed for and by the occasion in ways that would prove impossible without Hï Ibiza’s benchmark-setting specifications. And that’s just in the Theatre; head to the Club Room this summer and the likes of Patrick Topping, Paco Osuna, Vintage Culture, Damian Lazarus, and Meduza & James Hype will be leading sonic journeys of their own.So, what are we looking for in a great club? Beyond the obvious, perhaps adaptability and versatility are the key ingredients. An environment made for events that could only happen in there, at that moment. And a place that’s always ready to do it all over again, only different, tomorrow night. For many, though, The Wild Corner is actually Hï Ibiza’s hidden highlight, a unisex bathroom with CDJs, mixer and a ceiling illuminated in vivid colours. It’s serious yet fun, or maybe that should just be seriously fun. Back outside, The Magic Garden and Secret Garden provide respite from the chaos, places to kick back, relax and talk nonsense to anyone who will listen. Ethereal installations and luxurious teepees set the tone for these chillout oases. Each of these areas will make a huge impression in their own right, but arguably it’s the way every element of the complex can be fine-tuned to suit any event that guarantees so many returning visitors. Whatever the night, whoever is playing, things will look distinct compared to 24 hours earlier. “Our goal is always to create the best experience possible. We put our heart and soul into making every aspect of our events special, but the key element has and always will always be our guests. Without their continued support none of this would be possible. Taking the No. 1 spot in the DJ Mag Top 100 Clubs poll was a dream from the beginning, so to have been awarded the accolade for three years in a row feels incredible,”  says Yann Pissenem, founder, CEO and owner of Ushuaïa Entertainment, Ushuaïa Ibiza and Hï Ibiza. “Alongside our incredible family of headline residents, and world-first debuts from pioneering artists, this year clubbers will be able to explore the multi-room experience like never before as we embrace new technologies and showcase cutting-edge production, ensuring Ibiza’s legacy as one of the top clubbing destinations in the world.” So, what does that really mean for the standard bearer? 2024 will be the venue’s longest season to date, although in many ways much is the same. Hï Ibiza remains shorthand for a one-of-a-kind 360 nightlife experience unlike anything else on the island. It still means expertly programmed sessions led by extraordinary selectors, graced by groundbreaking guests. Impromptu back-to-back sets will continue to bring unforgettable surprises. And the beloved sessions and artists who call this place home are back, for good reason. Like Black Coffee and his sell-out soirée, and Afterlife, where Tale of Us’ melodic grooves form ethereal moments heightened by breathtaking imagery. David Guetta & MORTEN’s aptly-named Future Rave is also here again, marrying main stage tunes and warehouse noises with surrealist eye-candy. Glitterbox’s colourful, unabashed celebration of upfront house and disco is another contrast. Meanwhile, Eric Prydz will present a newly updated take on his legendary A/V displays, this time known as [CELL]. Whichever you hit — The Martinez Brothers or FISHER — the venue will be transformed for and by the occasion in ways that would prove impossible without Hï Ibiza’s benchmark-setting specifications. And that’s just in the Theatre; head to the Club Room this summer and the likes of Patrick Topping, Paco Osuna, Vintage Culture, Damian Lazarus, and Meduza & James Hype will be leading sonic journeys of their own. So, what are we looking for in a great club? Beyond the obvious, perhaps adaptability and versatility are the key ingredients. An environment made for events that could only happen in there, at that moment. And a place that’s always ready to do it all over again, only different, tomorrow night. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
2	Green Valley	Camboriú, Brazil	10,000	greenvalleybr.com	Green Valley continues to bounce back better since it was shuttered in 2020 by a double whammy of disasters. Not only was it forced to close, alongside virtually every other club in the world, by the Covid pandemic, but a few months later it was pretty much totally destroyed by a freak cyclone. The club has now been completely rebuilt and returns to the No. 2 spot this year.The beautiful Brazilian club started out simply as a party in the jungle. Some electronic dance music fans wanted to put on a big rave in 2007, and booked none other than Carl Cox to headline in a makeshift tent on an old airfield in the heart of the huge South American country. When this event was a spectacular success, they started booking other international DJs and growing some infrastructure to begin making it into a permanent venue. Three years later it had shot into the Top 100 Clubs poll at No. 27, and by 2013 it had been voted the No. 1 club in the world! It’s remained consistently popular globally, being voted into the top three every year since 2011 — an amazing achievement.In the past 12 months, Green Valley has continued to transform itself internally, tweaking the layout and air-con and redesigning the VIP and backstage areas. The main stage has undergone modifications to bring performers closer to the audience in order to foster closer connections between artists and fans, and a more immersive screen has also been added in order to enhance visual effects.The club offers a sublime mixture of musical attractions. In terms of the talent, Green Valley has continued to book everyone from the biggest names to underground heroes and local sensations. In the last 12 months these have included: Peggy Gou, Duke Dumont, Meduza, Eli & Fur, Vintage Culture, ANNA, Claptone, CamelPhat, Layla Benitez, Boris Brejcha, Yotto, Tale Of Us, WhoMadeWho, Adriatique, ARTBAT, Eric Prydz and Cristoph, to name just a few.“As Green Valley continues to evolve and adapt to the ever-changing landscape of electronic music and nightlife, one thing remains constant — its unwavering commitment to providing exceptional experiences for its customers,” says Antonio Afonso, International Managing Director of Green Valley. “With its blend of stunning natural surroundings, cutting-edge technology and world-class talent, GV stands as a beacon of innovation and creativity in the global dance music scene.” The beautiful Brazilian club started out simply as a party in the jungle. Some electronic dance music fans wanted to put on a big rave in 2007, and booked none other than Carl Cox to headline in a makeshift tent on an old airfield in the heart of the huge South American country. When this event was a spectacular success, they started booking other international DJs and growing some infrastructure to begin making it into a permanent venue. Three years later it had shot into the Top 100 Clubs poll at No. 27, and by 2013 it had been voted the No. 1 club in the world! It’s remained consistently popular globally, being voted into the top three every year since 2011 — an amazing achievement. In the past 12 months, Green Valley has continued to transform itself internally, tweaking the layout and air-con and redesigning the VIP and backstage areas. The main stage has undergone modifications to bring performers closer to the audience in order to foster closer connections between artists and fans, and a more immersive screen has also been added in order to enhance visual effects. The club offers a sublime mixture of musical attractions. In terms of the talent, Green Valley has continued to book everyone from the biggest names to underground heroes and local sensations. In the last 12 months these have included: Peggy Gou, Duke Dumont, Meduza, Eli & Fur, Vintage Culture, ANNA, Claptone, CamelPhat, Layla Benitez, Boris Brejcha, Yotto, Tale Of Us, WhoMadeWho, Adriatique, ARTBAT, Eric Prydz and Cristoph, to name just a few. “As Green Valley continues to evolve and adapt to the ever-changing landscape of electronic music and nightlife, one thing remains constant — its unwavering commitment to providing exceptional experiences for its customers,” says Antonio Afonso, International Managing Director of Green Valley. “With its blend of stunning natural surroundings, cutting-edge technology and world-class talent, GV stands as a beacon of innovation and creativity in the global dance music scene.” Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
3	Echostage	Washington, DC, USA	3,000	echostage.com	Based in the capital of the United States, Echostage ranks among the country’s most dazzling dance venues. A former Top 100 Clubs No. 1 — the first North American club to claim the top spot — it’s been in operation for 12 years, and the giant event space continues to evolve and innovate. In recent months, Echostage has had another refurb, with 130 new lighting fixtures, 56 precision beam fixtures, eight laser units, and 30 dynamic strobe fixtures, with the aim to evoke festival levels of production in an indoor space.The club sits on the site of two older venues, DC Tunnel and DC Star. Opened in 2012, it’s a sprawling, 30,000-square-foot warehouse-like space, equipped with confetti cannon, lasers, cryo-jets and a 14-by-40-foot LED screen. VIPs can take advantage of its mezzanine area and bottle service tables, and there’s an d&b Audiotechnik V-Series sound system with D80 amplifiers — the first of its kind to be installed on America’s East Coast — capable of delivering 48,000 watts of sound.In the last year, Echostage booked many of the biggest dance acts across the genre spectrum, including Tale Of Us, GRiZ, Gryffin, Charlotte de Witte, Netsky, Pendulum, The Martinez Brothers, SVDDEN DEATH, Marshmello and Black Coffee, as well as hosting the first-ever Boiler Room DC. Previous appearances at the venue include Tiësto, FISHER and Timmy Trumpet, but the club is not only a magnet for prestige dance acts: pop and hip-hop royalty like Lil Yachty, Cardi B, Sam Smith, Lorde and Miley Cyrus have dropped in to grace its huge stage.Though less well-known for its dance music history than other American cities like Chicago, Detroit and New York, Washington, DC has its own bubbling scene that has given rise to everyone from Deep Dish and Beautiful Swimmers to the Black Rave Culture crew. Echostage is another vital part of the puzzle that has put the US capital on the map for clubbers.Echostage runs pre- and post-event parties for its own massive Project GLOW Festival that takes place each April in the city’s RFK Grounds, and runs Halloween-themed events in October. At the end of December each year, the club hosts Echothon, a week-long event series in the run-up to New Year’s Eve, inviting some of the biggest DJs to spark the festive atmosphere. This summer, the club will stage the debut elrow DC event in Washington, and an impressive billing of artists is already locked in for autumn. The club sits on the site of two older venues, DC Tunnel and DC Star. Opened in 2012, it’s a sprawling, 30,000-square-foot warehouse-like space, equipped with confetti cannon, lasers, cryo-jets and a 14-by-40-foot LED screen. VIPs can take advantage of its mezzanine area and bottle service tables, and there’s an d&b Audiotechnik V-Series sound system with D80 amplifiers — the first of its kind to be installed on America’s East Coast — capable of delivering 48,000 watts of sound. In the last year, Echostage booked many of the biggest dance acts across the genre spectrum, including Tale Of Us, GRiZ, Gryffin, Charlotte de Witte, Netsky, Pendulum, The Martinez Brothers, SVDDEN DEATH, Marshmello and Black Coffee, as well as hosting the first-ever Boiler Room DC. Previous appearances at the venue include Tiësto, FISHER and Timmy Trumpet, but the club is not only a magnet for prestige dance acts: pop and hip-hop royalty like Lil Yachty, Cardi B, Sam Smith, Lorde and Miley Cyrus have dropped in to grace its huge stage. Though less well-known for its dance music history than other American cities like Chicago, Detroit and New York, Washington, DC has its own bubbling scene that has given rise to everyone from Deep Dish and Beautiful Swimmers to the Black Rave Culture crew. Echostage is another vital part of the puzzle that has put the US capital on the map for clubbers. Echostage runs pre- and post-event parties for its own massive Project GLOW Festival that takes place each April in the city’s RFK Grounds, and runs Halloween-themed events in October. At the end of December each year, the club hosts Echothon, a week-long event series in the run-up to New Year’s Eve, inviting some of the biggest DJs to spark the festive atmosphere. This summer, the club will stage the debut elrow DC event in Washington, and an impressive billing of artists is already locked in for autumn. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
4	Ushuaïa Ibiza	Ibiza, Spain	7,700	theushuaiaexperience.comEven on an island full of clubbing mythology, Ushuaïa Ibiza stands out. We've all heard the fabled story of founder Yann Pissenem stumbling on a “wild and almost undiscovered beach” near Playa d’en Bossa. A breathtaking place that invoked the end of the world, or at least the southernmost tip of Argentina, tales from the small cabana bar he launched there in 2008, and word-of-mouth free parties that sprung up right on the sand, have already been committed to the great pantheons of Balearic nightlife.Sixteen years on, or thereabouts, Ushuaïa Ibiza still stands on the same stunning spot, but has grown, evolved and developed, changing the face of daytime clubbing on the island with it. Today, it is one of Ibiza's biggest and most high-profile dancefloors, a sprawling music-hotel complex with chic rooms looking out onto a beautiful beach, central pool, and iconic mainstage; focal points for some of the most in-demand day-into-evening tickets on the planet, powered by state-of-the-art sonics in the form of a razor-sharp Adamson multi-diffusion sound system. Tunes seem to follow you around every corner of the mammoth address, which is transformed for each occasion.The ideal canvas for others to realise high-concept White Isle experiences, in 2023 residencies featured some of the biggest in the business: Armin van Buuren, Calvin Harris, F*** Me I’m Famous! by David Guetta, Tomorrowland presents Dimitri Vegas & Like Mike, Kygo, Martin Garrix, and Tiësto. Meanwhile, many of last summer’s standout guests also speak to versatility; we can think of few other clubs where you might catch Steve Aoki or Skepta, Timmy Trumpet or TSHA, Afrojack or ANOTR. Other highlights, like Bicep, Peggy Gou, Mattn, Honeyluv, Monki, Maya Jane Coles, Maceo Plex, Swedish House Mafia and Eric Prydz only emphasise our point, and we’ve still not mentioned ANTS.A cornerstone of this open air club since 2013, the weekly Saturday party looks deeper underground for its tech and techno soundtrack, while aesthetics nod to sci-fi surrealism beneath Balearic skies. Favourites like Andrea Oliva lead the charge from a booth that this summer will be graced by the likes of Boris Brejcha, Paul Kalkbrenner, Loco Dice, Nicole Moudaber, Mau P, Chelina Manuhutu, John Summit and more. In 2024, the new ANTS Next Gen Artist Programme will nurture raw, fresh talent, helping DJs hone skills and moulding tomorrow’s prize headliners. Meanwhile, the venue itself welcomes Defected Records to the wider programme. The label will celebrate its 25th anniversary every Tuesday throughout what will be the longest season in Ushuaïa Ibiza's storied history. See you down the front.	Even on an island full of clubbing mythology, Ushuaïa Ibiza stands out. We've all heard the fabled story of founder Yann Pissenem stumbling on a “wild and almost undiscovered beach” near Playa d’en Bossa. A breathtaking place that invoked the end of the world, or at least the southernmost tip of Argentina, tales from the small cabana bar he launched there in 2008, and word-of-mouth free parties that sprung up right on the sand, have already been committed to the great pantheons of Balearic nightlife. Sixteen years on, or thereabouts, Ushuaïa Ibiza still stands on the same stunning spot, but has grown, evolved and developed, changing the face of daytime clubbing on the island with it. Today, it is one of Ibiza's biggest and most high-profile dancefloors, a sprawling music-hotel complex with chic rooms looking out onto a beautiful beach, central pool, and iconic mainstage; focal points for some of the most in-demand day-into-evening tickets on the planet, powered by state-of-the-art sonics in the form of a razor-sharp Adamson multi-diffusion sound system. Tunes seem to follow you around every corner of the mammoth address, which is transformed for each occasion. The ideal canvas for others to realise high-concept White Isle experiences, in 2023 residencies featured some of the biggest in the business: Armin van Buuren, Calvin Harris, F*** Me I’m Famous! by David Guetta, Tomorrowland presents Dimitri Vegas & Like Mike, Kygo, Martin Garrix, and Tiësto. Meanwhile, many of last summer’s standout guests also speak to versatility; we can think of few other clubs where you might catch Steve Aoki or Skepta, Timmy Trumpet or TSHA, Afrojack or ANOTR. Other highlights, like Bicep, Peggy Gou, Mattn, Honeyluv, Monki, Maya Jane Coles, Maceo Plex, Swedish House Mafia and Eric Prydz only emphasise our point, and we’ve still not mentioned ANTS. A cornerstone of this open air club since 2013, the weekly Saturday party looks deeper underground for its tech and techno soundtrack, while aesthetics nod to sci-fi surrealism beneath Balearic skies. Favourites like Andrea Oliva lead the charge from a booth that this summer will be graced by the likes of Boris Brejcha, Paul Kalkbrenner, Loco Dice, Nicole Moudaber, Mau P, Chelina Manuhutu, John Summit and more. In 2024, the new ANTS Next Gen Artist Programme will nurture raw, fresh talent, helping DJs hone skills and moulding tomorrow’s prize headliners. Meanwhile, the venue itself welcomes Defected Records to the wider programme. The label will celebrate its 25th anniversary every Tuesday throughout what will be the longest season in Ushuaïa Ibiza's storied history. See you down the front. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
5	Bootshaus	Cologne, Germany	1,800		bootshaus.tv Originally a storage and repair facility for boats, Bootshaus has become Cologne's premier club. Across four floors, Bootshaus is a veritable playground for electronic music, with each room cultivating a distinct vibe and aesthetic — and with a sound system to match. Whether you are spending time in BLCKBX, the club's renowned bass sanctuary, or getting hypnotised by the custom-made L-Acoustics sound system in the biggest space, Mainfloor, each of the rooms is designed for an immersive clubbing experience.This diversity of layout is matched by the distinct programming of the club. Bootshaus has grown alongside a number of Cologne's key musical brands, handing the reins over to local powerhouses like Blacklist, Nibirii and Unreal, who each curate distinct parties — from Nibirii's impeccable psychedelic take on trance to Blacklist’s masterclasses in the dark art of bass weight. These partnerships have also led to esteemed residencies at the club. Alongside Bootshaus' own resident roster, helmed by Brandon, Dave Replay, Emin, Isis Cloudt, Kevin Arnold, and Oliver Magenta, Blacklist has introduced Autodrive, Badfella, Flobu, Makla, and Sekula to the club, and Nibirii brings in Gourski and LYNE. Beyond the club itself, Nibirii and Blacklist have now become established festival brands, further cementing Bootshaus' centrality into the larger electronic music ecosystem.Over the past year, the club had some of its biggest bookings to date, with parties headlined by Amelie Lens, Reinier Zonnefeld, DJ Diesel (Shaq), Headhunterz, I Hate Models, James Hype, KSHMR, Meduza, Oliver Heldens, Vini Vici and many more. 2023 was also an exciting year for the club, as it added a bit of ’90s throwback thanks to a new chillout lounge and expanded the open space in Mainfloor.2024 will mark 20 years of business for Bootshaus, a milestone that only a few clubs in the world can boast. To celebrate, the club is introducing the brand new L-Acoustics sound system in Mainfloor. When it comes to musical programming over the next year, the team will continue to think expansively about electronic music in all its forms and aim to push the envelope in terms of the diversification of sounds on offer. This diversity of layout is matched by the distinct programming of the club. Bootshaus has grown alongside a number of Cologne's key musical brands, handing the reins over to local powerhouses like Blacklist, Nibirii and Unreal, who each curate distinct parties — from Nibirii's impeccable psychedelic take on trance to Blacklist’s masterclasses in the dark art of bass weight. These partnerships have also led to esteemed residencies at the club. Alongside Bootshaus' own resident roster, helmed by Brandon, Dave Replay, Emin, Isis Cloudt, Kevin Arnold, and Oliver Magenta, Blacklist has introduced Autodrive, Badfella, Flobu, Makla, and Sekula to the club, and Nibirii brings in Gourski and LYNE. Beyond the club itself, Nibirii and Blacklist have now become established festival brands, further cementing Bootshaus' centrality into the larger electronic music ecosystem. Over the past year, the club had some of its biggest bookings to date, with parties headlined by Amelie Lens, Reinier Zonnefeld, DJ Diesel (Shaq), Headhunterz, I Hate Models, James Hype, KSHMR, Meduza, Oliver Heldens, Vini Vici and many more. 2023 was also an exciting year for the club, as it added a bit of ’90s throwback thanks to a new chillout lounge and expanded the open space in Mainfloor. 2024 will mark 20 years of business for Bootshaus, a milestone that only a few clubs in the world can boast. To celebrate, the club is introducing the brand new L-Acoustics sound system in Mainfloor. When it comes to musical programming over the next year, the team will continue to think expansively about electronic music in all its forms and aim to push the envelope in terms of the diversification of sounds on offer.  Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
6	The Warehouse Project at Depot Mayfield	Manchester, England	10,000	thewarehouseproject.com	Since its inception in 2006, The Warehouse Project (WHP) has taken root in many different venues across Manchester, including its legendary stint at Store Street. In 2019, it settled into the former railway yard and Royal Mail distribution centre that is Depot Mayfield, renovating it into the mammoth multi-purpose venue that it is now. The space has kept its raw, industrial feel, with exposed bricks, concrete floors, and vast iron framework. Last season alone, WHP had the likes of Bicep, Four Tet, Leftfield, Peggy Gou, Yung Singh and Honey Dijon come through, with a star-studded list of resident DJs on rotation that include I. JORDAN, Interplanetary Criminal, Effy and Aletha. Spring this year will see the launch of a new series called ARCHIVE ONLY, where artists such as Daphni, Girls Don’t Sync and East End Dubs will play in the intimate setting of the Archive room on Thursdays. The full 2024 season will return from September until New Year’s Eve; the line-ups are yet to be revealed, but expect many new club debuts as well as the return of beloved collaborators and curators. After showcases in Rotterdam and Antwerp last year, WHP will be going international again — and this time even further afield, programming showcases for Sydney and Melbourne in Australia this May. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
7	fabric	London, UK	1,855	fabriclondon.com	Few clubs in the world are as storied as fabric. The Charterhouse Street venue, which was upgraded from a cold meat storage facility back in 1999, has been at the forefront of electronic music for almost 25 years. A staple (and previous winner) of the Top 100 Clubs poll, 2024 sees the club reclaim its place in the top 10, and it’s no surprise after a year when everyone seemed to be talking about fabric. The last 12 months saw a redesign of the iconic main entrance, and the opening of a new shop selling pizza, soft drinks, music and merch. Bookings, as always, included the cream of the underground, alongside residents Craig Richards, Terry Francis, Anna Wall, Bobby., Harry McCanna, Hutch, Jaden Thompson and Josh Caffé. The fabric, FABRICLIVE and Continuum events have been joined by new Sunday series C.A.Y.A. (Come As You Are), and Love Hertz, which launched with a show at St. Paul’s Cathedral. But the big focus now is the 25th anniversary year, with the past, present and future of fabric coming together via the Invites series, where long-term collaborators are given the chance to curate club nights, a run of takeovers at other clubs like Fuse, Tresor and Lux Fragil, and six events curated by Craig Richards. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
8	Amnesia	Ibiza, Spain	3,900		amnesia.es Amnesia lies on the road connecting the busy areas of Ibiza Town in the southeast to San Antonio in the west. Despite its relative distance to the main action, the island’s original superclub continues to pull more than its weight. From its early days as a countercultural haven and then hub for Balearic pioneers, to its shift as a global player with the explosion of rave culture, the club has outlived many of its peers, continuing to pull in new generations of talent. Carl Cox, Sven Väth, Chase & Status and Skrillex have all spun in one of its two rooms, while Underworld, Public Enemy and 50 Cent have performed live on its stages. It also remains a key attraction for well-known faces — Naomi Campbell, Cristiano Ronaldo and Leonardo DiCaprio have been spotted at the iconic location. But it’s the club’s attention to detail, from its residency programming to party curation, that’s kept it relevant to new waves of electronic music lovers. This year's opening party includes sets from top-tier DJs such as Dennis Cruz, Green Velvet, Honey Dijon and Nina Kraviz. Jamie Jones will continue to host his Paradise series there too — not to mention the legendary Do Not Sleep and elrow parties. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
9	Savaya	Bali, Indonesia	2,500	savaya.com	Nestled amidst the untamed beauty of the jungle and elevated 100 metres above the Indian Ocean on the limestone cliffs of Uluwatu at Bali's southernmost point, Savaya embraces the boundless energy of nature, offering an immersive and transformative experience to all who visit. In a span of just three years, operating daily, Savaya has captured the attention of global audiences, and makes an incredible Top 100 Clubs debut by jumping right into the top 10. Renowned for its entertainment, the Dayclub has hosted globally acclaimed talents such as Black Coffee, Boris Brejcha, Calvin Harris, Charlotte de Witte, Eric Prydz, FISHER, Jamie Jones, Keinemusik and RÜFÜS DU SOL. Often this has been through the venue’s own curated Law Of The Jungle series, but brands such elrow have also been queuing up to host their own events. “We're thankful to the people of Bali for their warmth and vibrant culture, which inspire our team to deliver unforgettable experiences at Sayava,” founder Alex Cordova says. “Bali is evolving from a tropical paradise into a global music destination. As Bali embraces its role as a future entertainment hub, we aim to follow suit, captivating and energising guests by seamlessly blending culture, luxury and excitement to create unparalleled entertainment." Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
10	Laroc Club	Valinhos, Brazil	5,000		laroc.club With its top-level DJ bookings, genuinely impressive open-air mainstage area, festival-standard production values, and smart integration into the local natural environment, Laroc Club near Valinhos in São Paulo state continues to put the super into superclub. Rising steadily through the DJ Mag Top 100 Clubs chart since its first appearance in 2017, the venue has styled itself as a festival experience within a club, and it makes the most of the gorgeous weather, glorious sunsets and connection with nature that its outdoor setting provides. On the decks, top class EDM DJs regularly entertain a mix of dedicated locals and clued-up visitors, with appearances in 2024 from Tiësto, James Hype, Steve Aoki, John Summit, Meduza, R3HAB, Gorgon City, Mochakk, Alok, Steve Angello, CamelPhat, Yotto, Kasablanca, Vintage Culture, and Peggy Gou. Looking forward to the rest of 2024, the club remains committed to its strategy of booking big names that don’t visit Brazil very often. “Additionally, we intend to continue with some labels that were successful at the club,” the Laroc team tells us, “such as Spektrum, a night focused on psytrance, and Ame Laroc Festival in 2025, and to return with Laroc Guarujá, a club of the brand located on the coast of São Paulo.” Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
11	Illuzion	Phuket, Thailand	5,000	illuzionphuket.comA gigantic venue built on the site of Ocean Plaza, a former shopping mall, Illuzion is one of Southeast Asia’s best clubs. Located in the popular tourist spot, Patong Beach, its three rooms sprawl over 6,500 square metres and come equipped with Funktion-One, L-Acoustics and Outline sound systems. In addition to its 300 VIP tables, there’s a 100-square-metre, high-definition LED wall, and, in the last year, the club has built a new DJ booth and incorporated 80 new beam, strobe, and blinder LED lights.Illuzion is split into distinct areas, with Empire Discotheque dedicated to hip-hop, Shelter focusing on techno, and a VIP room with opulent balconies, multiple bars and its own dancefloor. Visually and sonically impressive, Illuzion is no slouch when it comes to DJ bookings either. Its flagship promotion, Elevation, a tech-house event, has featured Nic Fanciulli, Paco Osuna, Claptone, Solardo, GORDO, James Hype and Meduza, and has a distinctive visual identity typified by triangle motifs.Celebrating a decade in operation this year, the club is more popular than ever, with an 18% uptick in club-goers in 2023: 2.3 million in total, setting a record for Southeast Asia. Looking ahead, the club plans to “continue our success in attracting visitors from all over the world by regularly showcasing international DJs and singers”.	A gigantic venue built on the site of Ocean Plaza, a former shopping mall, Illuzion is one of Southeast Asia’s best clubs. Located in the popular tourist spot, Patong Beach, its three rooms sprawl over 6,500 square metres and come equipped with Funktion-One, L-Acoustics and Outline sound systems. In addition to its 300 VIP tables, there’s a 100-square-metre, high-definition LED wall, and, in the last year, the club has built a new DJ booth and incorporated 80 new beam, strobe, and blinder LED lights. Illuzion is split into distinct areas, with Empire Discotheque dedicated to hip-hop, Shelter focusing on techno, and a VIP room with opulent balconies, multiple bars and its own dancefloor. Visually and sonically impressive, Illuzion is no slouch when it comes to DJ bookings either. Its flagship promotion, Elevation, a tech-house event, has featured Nic Fanciulli, Paco Osuna, Claptone, Solardo, GORDO, James Hype and Meduza, and has a distinctive visual identity typified by triangle motifs. Celebrating a decade in operation this year, the club is more popular than ever, with an 18% uptick in club-goers in 2023: 2.3 million in total, setting a record for Southeast Asia. Looking ahead, the club plans to “continue our success in attracting visitors from all over the world by regularly showcasing international DJs and singers”.  Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
12	Noa Beach Club	Zrće Beach, Croatia	4,000	noa-beach.com	Noa Beach Club has been a steady fixture in the upper regions of our poll for several years now and it's not hard to see why. It is one of the shining lights of its native Croatian scene and a real anchor point for many of the summer's largest and most internationally renowned festivals. Events have included collaborations with legendary Ibiza club Amnesia and festivals like Oasis, hard dance smasher Forbidden Island, Hideout, and many more. Every year, the venue looks to raise the bar in terms of the DJs it offers for standalone parties, and in the last 12 months big names like MORTEN, Cuebrick and Vize have all left their mark, while well-known regional resident DJs Lorenzo, Mike & Me and NOIDE are amongst some of those with ever-growing profiles. As well as the music, the club’s location on the famous Zrće Beach on the Island of Pag makes Noa irresistible; it is built off the beach and over the Adriatic sea, with several different dancefloors and bars, a pool, chillout cabanas, palm trees, and huge sound systems all in and amongst organic and bohemian design features. It's a perfect open-air and sun-kissed beach club, frankly, and high rollers can even pull up to it by boat. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
13	Berghain	Berlin, Germany	1,500		berghain.de There’s more to Berghain than its eponymous main room. The club encompasses many different spaces: Panorama Bar, Kantine am Berghain, Halle, Lab.oratory, and Saüle. During the summer, the Garten provides a dusty, sun-drenched spot, brought to life by house DJs playing in the outdoor DJ booth. Inside, the industrial-style Berghain room has seen a range of talents play its fabled Funktion-One sound system, from Freddy K to Tasha to DJ Rolando. Upstairs, in Panorama Bar, brighter textures dominate the high-ceilinged space, with Avalon Emerson, Batu, Gabrielle Kwarteng and many more keeping the party going till Monday morning. Over the last 12 months, Berghain and Panorama Bar have hosted several label showcases and collectives. Darwin’s bass-fuelled REEF rumbled both floors, Sedef Adasï brought her HAMAM Nights to Panorama Bar, Marie Montexier curated a PARYìA showcase, and Lolsnake took their party weeeirdos to Berghain. Long-running events like Finest Thursday, Finest Friday, Snax, and the annual Silvester Klubnacht marathon on New Year’s Eve remain regular fixtures in the club’s calendar. Remaining one of a now growing number of venues to operate a strict no-camera policy, this former power plant offers a phone-free dancefloor where punters — and DJs — can soak up the full Berghain experience without digital distractions. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
14	Zouk Singapore	Singapore	2,900	zoukclub.com	Singapore's Zouk club has long been one of the leading lights in Asia. It is a club that is about so much more than big names — a night in the custom-built premises in Clarke Quay is a chance to explore four very different and distinctive clubs in one. The main space holds 1,900 ravers and offers a mix of neo-industrial and futuristic aesthetics that tap into influences taken from original warehouse parties in Berlin and New York. Spread over two floors and vast in scale, it is hard not to be impressed by the affectionately nicknamed lighting rig, called The Mothership, and the exposed concrete and rusted metal that grows up all around you as the beats rain down with great clarity from a custom sound system designed by audio engineer, Gary Stewart. Elsewhere you can explore more intimate surroundings in the 250-capacity Phuture, and enjoy a mix of hip-hop, breaks, and drum & bass; or chill out in the more stylised lounge setting of Capital, which holds just over 500 people and boasts multiple bars. Musically, Zouk hosts the most renowned names from the worlds of prog, trance and house, with the Anjunadeep crew, Miss Monique and Paul van Dyk having all left their mark in the last 12 months. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
15	Papaya	Zrće Beach, Croatia	3,500	papaya.com.hr	One of the famous quartet of venues nestled along the picturesque coastline of Novalja, Papaya Club emerged in 2002 as a bold new vision from Zagreb's nightlife moguls. All these years on, it is world-renowned as a key part of one of Europe's biggest summer festival operations. Originally a public waterslide site bordered by pebble beaches, Papaya Club boasts an open-air layout that allows guests to dance beneath the stars or the sun, just a few steps away from the Adriatic Sea. Its distinctive, shell-like main stage is complemented by a massive LED screen setup, while the pools host many daily and nightly parties, as well as festivals like Hideout, Sonus and Barrakud. Over the past year, the club has undergone significant enhancements, including the refurbishment of its VIP pool party area, which offers exclusive views and intimate spaces to chill away from the main action. The list of artists who have played in the last 12 months is long and impressive, with stars from across house and techno — like Deborah De Luca, GORDO, Marco Carola, The Martinez Brothers, and Meduza — gracing the decks. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
16	Play House	Chengdu, China	1,000	instagram.com/playhousechina	Chengdu’s PLAY HOUSE — the third of three PLAY HOUSE nightclub venues in China — makes a strong showing in the DJ Mag Top 100 Clubs poll for the fourth year running. Following their relocation in 2022 to an opulent former theatre building, PLAY HOUSE Chengdu is a huge venue that comes in at 7,500 square metres, and is an imposing 30 metres high inside. It’s split into three main spaces that include substantial breakout VIP lounges, and it also has a recording studio attached. The club is fitted with a super-clean L-Acoustics pro audio sound system and features jaw-dropping immersive audio/visual sync tech throughout, making it ideal not only for regular club nights, but also extravagant events like their Mid-Autumn Festival, which showcases new electronic music. PLAY HOUSE Chengdu uses its cavernous space and impressive production stages to great effect, specialising in no-holds-barred, high-production nights soundtracked by the big room sounds of EDM, electro house and trance, and in 2023 the club hosted appearances from DJ talent including Steve Aoki, Armin van Buuren, KSHMR, Zabo, MORTEN, Mike Williams and Alchimyst, supported by their resident DJ, Miss Ann. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
17	Fabrik	Madrid, Spain	6,000	fabrikclub.com	More reminiscent of a gigantic warehouse complex than a club, Madrid’s FABRIK is massive in every sense. Split over six distinct areas — the capacious Main Room, Open Air, more intimate Hangar, Satellite, Club and Crystal — and an outdoor stage, it even has its own hotel attached. FABRIK’s L-Acoustics sound system and location outside city limits ensure the volume gets cranked to the maximum, and style-wise, the club runs the gamut. So far in 2024, it’s hosted the Twist DNB XXL Festival with drum & bass bigwigs like Camo & Krooked, Black Sun Empire and Netsky, legends such as Dave Clarke, Len Faki and Ken Ishii, and tech-house from the elrow crew, while its promotions 150 and Code cater to hardstyle and techno heads respectively. This month, DJ Bone, Amelie Lens and Ben Sims play the Code party, while Technasia and Mason Collective are coming up later in spring.  Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
18	Ministry Of Sound	London, UK	1,600	ministryofsound.com	Now gearing up for its 33rd anniversary, London’s iconic Ministry of Sound (MoS) nightclub remains a place to be — one that persists in bending and tweaking, listening and learning from its followers and attendees. In the last 12 months, three of its four rooms have been given a big overhaul, with interiors stripped back to reveal the club’s original structure, DJ booths lowered to the ground, and a massive bar installed in The Loft. In short, the whole gaff has been re-engineered from a once bus garage to an impressive place that its dancers can always call home. Sound design as ever takes its place at the forefront of what makes MoS tick, with MoS kitted out with a bass-enhanced Martin Audio system. Even the entrance tunnel has ambient music pumped through on your way in. New alliances have been formed with NTS, Deviation and La Fiesta, and this year the likes of Dimitri From Paris and Bob Sinclar join up-and-comers Ammara, DAIRE and Demi Riquísimo, along with mainstays and co-promoters Piano People, Jungle Mania, Future Disco, Backto95 and Melting Pot. And, interestingly, as well as launching a new website, MoS has commissioned its own fragrance courtesy of Parisian master perfumer, Mark Buxton. Very fancy indeed. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
19	Studio 338	London, UK	2,500		studio338.co.uk London’s Studio 338 celebrated its 10-year anniversary in 2023. Situated on the Greenwich Peninsula, nowadays it’s a clubbing haven with five rooms, including the famed Terrace — one of the largest indoor terraces in Europe, in fact — equipped with a spectacular glass ceiling and Void sound system, and the outdoor Garden, with stunning views of London’s skyline and a chillout zone. There’s a VIP area for those who want a different clubbing experience than the frenzy of crowds, with a balcony overlooking the dancefloor and its own private bar and terrace area. There’s a second room in the Loft that’s considered the place for techno, and a basement-style room called Overflow. The main Terrace is rigged with a futuristic lighting system called THE GRID. In the past year, the club has continued to host nights for big brands such as Defected, ABODE, Sankeys, and Space Ibiza. For the first part of this year they’ll be hosting an Eastenderz Easter Rave, Cafe Mambo’s Mini-Festival featuring Todd Terry, Deborah De Luca, and the Release Garden Opening Party with Magda B2B Tania Vulcano, Anastasia Kristensen, Klose One, Peace Division and many more. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
20	PACHA IBIZA	Ibiza, Spain	3903	pacha.com	From its humble beginnings back in the early ’70s as a traditional Ibizan farmhouse in the wetlands of Talamanca, Pacha Ibiza has grown into one of the world’s most iconic clubs. The venue now boasts a 2,600-square-metre main room, a second room and restaurant, and numerous outdoor spaces. Aside from the small matter of celebrating the club’s 50th birthday in 2023, the Pacha Ibiza team also found time to renovate the VIP area, and upgrade the already impressive dynamic visual installation in the main room, doubling the LED screen’s previous resolution — and they’re installing a further huge video wall too. It’s party time seven nights a week at Pacha through summer, including CamelPhat on Tuesdays, Marco Carola’s Music On on Fridays and Solomun’s +1 Sunday session, and over the last 12 months the club has booked a range of DJs from Moodyman, Peggy Gou, Honey Dijon and Luciano to Fatboy Slim, Steve Angelo and Pete Tong. Together with Pacha Ibiza’s other residents — Bedouin, Robin Schulz, Purple Disco Machine, Diplo, Hugel, Lost Frequencies and Bora Uzer — the club will be kicking off the 2024 season with a series of one-off events with, to name a few, WhoMadeWho, Ben Böhmer, Roger Sanchez, Loco Dice, Keinemusik, Kölsch and Ida Engberg, before heading into another no doubt killer summer season. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
21	Cavo Paradiso	Mykonos Island, Greece	3,000		cavoparadiso.gr Mykonos is known for many things, from its paradisal beaches to its luxury hotels, but one of the most unique enclaves on the island is Cavo Paradiso. The club blends the beauty of Mykonos’ landscape with electronic sounds, hosting the finest names in dance music since 1993. Peggy Gou, David Morales, Steve Aoki, and many more have graced the near-mystical space in the last 12 months alone. Nestled in a 100-foot cliff overlooking the crystalline waters of the Aegean, Cavo Paradiso lives up to its name. With an open-air dancefloor and Funktion-One sound system, everything about it feels pristine. Headed up by Stathis Lazarides, Coolis Kalopetris and Lorenzo Papachrisanthou, Cavo Paradiso is in capable and considerate hands. “The scene would not survive if it was just festivals,” Lazarides told DJ Mag in an interview this year. “Clubs are incredibly important, everything started from the clubs. So places like Cavo remaining healthy is really important, for the scene as a whole.” Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
22	Avant Gardner & The Brooklyn Mirage	Brooklyn, NY, USA	8,000+	avant-gardner.com	Mentions of award-winning production, KV2 sound systems, multiple stages, and back-to-back line-ups featuring the world’s largest DJs might conjure thoughts of a fully fledged music festival, but there’s a venue in Brooklyn that boasts all these elements and more. We’re talking about the Avant Gardner complex in Bushwick’s industrial zone, and its seasonal mammoth, The Brooklyn Mirage. Accommodating more than 8,000 club-goers, this sprawling destination spans a full city block, and offers all of the amenities for day-into-night clubbing, including three distinct spaces, six bars, a food court, and North America’s largest 15k-resolution LED wall, measuring in at 200 by 30 feet. During cooler months, the more intimate Kings Hall and the masterfully rigged Great Hall deliver a premier megaclub experience in NYC, but during summertime the good vibes flow into the four-storey, outdoor Brooklyn Mirage, which is soon set to welcome Armin van Buurren, Carl Cox, Keinemusik, REZZ and any other massive act you’re likely to imagine. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
23	Surreal Park	Camboriú, Brazil	20,000		surreal.art.br Dreamt up by Renato Ratier, Surreal Park is set over 102,000 square metres in the south of Brazil, and it lives up to its name with five distinctive dancefloors. At Bells — also known as the techno barn — a huge bell hangs over the DJ booth, and there are goats up in the roof. Later in the year the venue opens JETSET, a new stage built around the body of a Boeing 727-200. And this summer it hosted an outdoor stage, Ritual, inspired by Ratier`s 2023 album of the same name, which had a capacity of over 10,000 people. Small wonder then that Surreal Park welcomed 160 artists in 2023, including Loco Dice, Nina Kraviz, Seth Troxler, Boys Noize, Mind Against, Dixon, Stephan Bodzin, Carl Cox and Black Coffee. While floods and currency depreciation made it a tough year for the club and the country in general, Surreal Park was also able to draw on its loyal clubbers to organise food and clothing collection campaigns for those in need.  Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
24	Academy LA	Los Angeles, CA, USA	1,500		academy.la Nestled in the heart of Los Angeles, Academy LA is the latest incarnation of a venue that has previously been known as Create Nightclub, Vanguard, and Qtopia. It has been under the auspices of Insomniac Events since 2018, however, and made huge strides with its state-of-the-art Funktion-One sound system. The club's dynamic line-up of events showcases an eclectic mix of world-renowned artists, from Dimitri Vegas & Like Mike to Alan Walker, and includes nights such as Dreamstate for trance, Factory 93 for underground sounds, Bassrush for bass, Lost in Dreams for melodic, Basscon for hardstyle, and Day Trip for house music. Boasting five distinct rooms adorned with 145 customisable LED curved ceiling panels, 55 moving lights, and several CO2 cannons, the club offers an experience like no other in the region and looking ahead, Academy LA remains committed to elevating its offerings with plans for thematic soirées and much more throughout 2024 and beyond. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
25	Culture Club Revelin	Dubrovnik, Croatia	1,500	clubrevelin.com	Nestled in Dubrovnik's historic Old Town within the formidable Revelin Fortress, Culture Club Revelin has been a beacon of Croatia's underground nightlife since its inception in 2011. Originally a 16th-century medieval bastion, over the past year it has undergone significant upgrades to its state-of-the-art lighting and video effects, dynamic LED displays and captivating laser shows. The club attracts top-tier talent across the house and techno spectrum, like Dubfire, Mood II Swing and Sasha, and hosts parties every night of the week. Resident DJs like BoZZo and DJ Speed keep the local scene thriving, and there are plenty of plans afoot to keep the venue right at the cutting edge, with the incorporation of new production technologies that make use of artificial intelligence and holographic solutions. All of that should help keep it right at the forefront of destination nightclubs both nationally and internationally. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
26	DC-10	Ibiza, Spain	1,500	instagram.com/dc10ibizaofficial	An old farmhouse turned top-tier club situated between Ibiza Town and Playa d’en Bossa, DC-10 remains one of the most storied spaces on the White Isle. Its proximity to the airport adds a dystopian feel (in a good way) as the best of house and techno talents upend the main terrace and outdoor area, its Void Acoustics system drowning out the noise of aeroplanes just overhead. On Monday nights, Circoloco reigns supreme, booking artists like Hot Since 82, FJAAK, Chloé Caillet, Peach, and many more. Michael Bibi and PAWSA’s Solid Grooves and Amelie Lens’ EXHALE are two globally renowned brands that also take over the club in the summer months, affirming DC-10’s diverse music policy and multi-faceted creative direction, from sunny tech-house to dark techno. While there are several superclubs dotted across the island, DC-10 will always be a more intimate and inviting spot, reflecting the magic and allure Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
27	Exchange LA	Los Angeles, CA, USA	1,000	exchangela.com	 With its art deco filigree, marble flourishes, seven bars, extravagant lighting system and 30-by-40-foot LED screen, Exchange LA — in a former life, the 1930s-era Los Angeles Stock Exchange — certainly looks the part of a Top 100 club. With its Funktion-One system, it sounds like one as well. But the proof of the pleasure palace’s status comes via those who have played there, thanks in large part to a longstanding partnership with Insomniac Events. With a slew of nights dedicated to specific genres (bass music, house, techno, hardstyle, reggaeton and more), that list takes in a wide swathe of artists, with names like The Martinez Brothers, Gorgon City, Armin van Buuren, Above & Beyond, Charlotte de Witte and Chase & Status just a few of those to have graced the Exchange decks in the past. The club is currently closed for renovations and improvements, with a redesign of the video and lighting layout in the works as well, ensuring artists of that calibre will continue to pack the kids into the downtown LA standby.  Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
28	The Concourse Project	Austin, TX	2,000	concourseproject.com	No two visits to The Concourse Project are quite the same — and according to founders Andrew Parsons and Kelly Gray of RealMusic Events, and their creative partner and co-founder, David Brinkley — that’s the allure. “A key element of The Concourse Project is that we update our production and lighting rig throughout the year to enhance experiences and keep things fresh,” Gray explains. “We make edits or add new touches all around and the community feels a part of the journey, the ever-evolving project.” And what an evolution it’s been! Since opening in 2021, the 18,000-square-foot warehouse set on 15 acres has become a cornerstone of Austin’s electronic scene, hosting 2,000-cap shows and intimate club nights, while each fall, serving as the centerpiece for the three-stage festival, Seismic Dance Event. Outfitted with a d&b Audiotechnik sound system in its main room (and an authentic taco trailer on the patio!) this scalable, modular space suits underground acts and scene titans alike, such as Purple Disco Machine, Tiësto and Wax Motif, who will appear there in the coming months. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
29	ShiShi Bali	Bali, Indonesia	1,000	shishibali.com	Following its first entry in the poll last year, ShiShi Bali returns for its second year running, and it’s no surprise considering its fast-growing reputation as a lush and lavish clubbing experience in Indonesia. Open seven days a week, the cocktail bar, restaurant and nightclub sprawls across three floors. Styled with a blend of boho aesthetics and futuristic design, complemented by an innovative lighting and sound system, ShiShi evokes an other-worldly atmosphere just a 10-minute stroll from Petitenget Beach. With a dress code of “upscale fashionable”, ShiShi is the kind of place for a special occasion, enhanced by its extensive music policy. It’s a more relaxed affair in the Izakaya Lounge, while the second floor channels high-energy EDM. On the top floor, R&B pumps from the state-of-the-art sound system well into the early hours. Artists like Sheila Marcia, Lizzy Wang, P.Joana and many more have recently headlined the club.  Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
30	Club Space	Miami, FL, USA	2,000	clubspace.com	Over 20 years deep, what was once an industrial warehouse is now one of Miami’s most respected nightclubs. While the clubbing landscape in the coastal Florida city is ever changing, Club Space has continued to build a solid reputation and an ever-growing events programme that sets it apart from the rest. Bookings in the past year include Kerri Chandler, Luciano, Apollonia, Avalon Emerson, Chris Stussy, Astra Club, Sweely, Gene On Earth and many more. The club has become known for its extended opening hours; on weekends it's open, on average, for 12-hour stints, often bumped up to 20 hours on special occasions. The longest on record are two 36-hour parties for the closings of Miami Music Week and Art Basel. The club’s famous Terrace has become the place to be for those memorable sunrise and sunset moments. As well as programming even more marathon weekends this year, Club Space is also working on further expansion and integration with Miami venue Factory Town.  Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
31	Lost Beach Club	Montañita, Ecuador	2,500	instagram.com/lostbeachclub	Lost Beach, the clubbing oasis in the town of Montañita on the Ecuadorian coast, has become used to thriving in adversity, overcoming obstacles to put on parties often against the odds. The latest tricky situation is the small matter of martial law being imposed in Ecuador by new president Daniel Noboa in January, in an attempt to combat drug gangs. Despite this, and various curfews in 2023, Lost Beach still managed to host the likes of Mochakk, Apollonia, wAFF, Franky Rizardo, Solardo, Josh Butler, Yousef, Latmun and Doc Martin last year, an epic 80-hour Taraka event helmed by GORDO, and the week-long Trotamindo festival — co-organised by Un_Mute from Miami — which foregrounded underground DJs, “helping us find our identity again since tech-house, which was mostly played at the club these past few years, has become so commercial,” Lost Beach head honcho Kami tells DJ Mag. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
32	WAVE Club	Taipei	1200		wavetaipei.tw 2024 will be the 10th year that Taiwan’s two-floor, 700-square-foot, Wave Club has been in business. Growing from a small venue via a process of constantly tweaking small details to continually improve the experience at the venue, Wave Club is now a quality rave space fitted out with a pristine Funktion-One sound system, a soundproofed VIP area, and a long outdoor terrace. The venue runs themed events and local artists during the week, with major club nights taking place on Fridays and Saturdays. The past year saw Wave Club bring in DJs like Fedde Le Grand, Cat Dealers, NERVO, Slander and KURA to accompany the club’s nine local residents: Alyshia, Ashleybaby, Anita, Andrew Ford, Big B, Leyo, Maruo, TIM, and WANP. Ten years in the game certainly speaks to Wave Club doing something right, and in 2024 the club hopes to build on its success by expanding its presence “across Asia on a large scale”. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
33	Motion	Bristol, UK	4,000	motion-bristol.com	Motion has aged well. It used to be enough for the skatepark-turned-warehouse venue to rely on little more than its austere appearance, big DJ bookings and Funktion-One speakers. But that was pre-pandemic, and Motion has since had to fight for its survival by inviting more live acts to perform there, making better use of its space, and winning the right to keep its noise levels the same. The team’s hard work has paid off, and as of last year, Motion was able to relaunch its In:Motion series, which books some of dance music’s most sought-after DJs. Garage legend DJ EZ, Canada’s Jayda G, and rising star O’Flynn are just a few recent highlights.  A manager for the club said that now the team are working to make Motion an even more immersive clubbing experience, with a 360º stage and ceiling screens, while also looking at how they can use Motion’s worldwide renown to encourage revellers to attend other grassroots venues around the city. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
34	Watergate	Berlin, Germany	800		water-gate.de Berlin’s Watergate lies on the southside of the Oberbaum Bridge, an unlikely oasis with an iconic view overlooking the River Spree. It opened its doors over two decades ago and in the years since has played a key part in nurturing upcoming talent, from Anja Schneider and Dixon to megastar Solomun. Other international artists have graced its decks over the years — Carl Cox, Amelie Lens and Kerri Chandler, to name a few — but the club has continued to push into new realms of sound, like with RISE, a monthly party series championing artists in the Afro-house and Afro-tech space. This year, Watergate welcomed Buttons, one of the city’s most loved queer crews, to host regular nights and make good use of the club’s incomparable panoramic views. The split-level, two-room venue is famous for its floor-to-ceiling glass windows, but there’s nothing quite like watching the sun set — and rise — from its floating terrace. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
35	Warung Beach Club	Santa Catarina, Brazil	2,500	instagram.com/warungbeachclub	Warung Beach Club has played an important part in Brazil’s clubbing culture since its inception in 2002. The beautiful scenery, like the Atlantic forest surrounding the beachside location, creates an even more magical experience, and the structure is built from local and natural materials and themed around traditional Indonesian temples. The club, also known as The Temple, stretches 2,000 square metres, with two dancefloors and a balcony that offers stunning views across the Atlantic ocean — a noteworthy spot for sunrises and unforgettable moments. Over the years, many superstar DJs have graced the booth, from the likes of Sven Väth, Sasha, Carl Cox, John Digweed, Laurent Garnier and Richie Hawtin to Honey Dijon, Mind Against, Amelie Lens, Bonobo, Charlotte de Witte, and Mano Le Tough. As well as the seamless club programming, in 2012 the team launched Warung Recordings, a record label dedicated to the sounds of the club and its associated artists.  Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
36	The Penthouse	Dubai, UAE	1,010		thepenthouse.co/dubai It’s hard to get more luxurious than The Penthouse Dubai. Looking out over Dubai’s famed Marina skyline on one side and downtown on the other, the venue features a rooftop terrace, lounge, and club, all powered by the finest L-Acoustics sound system. The music offerings are similarly expansive, covering everything from house to hip-hop, and 2023 saw clubland royalty spin behind the decks. Bookings included the likes of Robin Schulz, Hot Since 82, Chris Stussy, Solardo, Alec Monopoly, Nic Fanciulli, Mahmut Orhan, Eli & Fur, Lee Burridge, Mambo Brothers, Jamiie, Wade, Tita Lau, Joel Corry, Dimitri Vegas & Like Mike, Lost Frequencies and Meduza. One of the main focuses of the past year has been crafting an immersive experience for punters. The ceiling includes over 20,000 LED bulbs that reflect off the UV-painted walls, creating a veritable never-never land for lucky clubbers. 2024 is already shaping up to be a benchmark year with bookings including TSHA and Cloonee to name just a few.  Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
37	WARP Shinjuku	Tokyo, Japan	1,000		warp-shinjuku.jp WARP debuted in our poll in 2020 and has been a constant ever since. Part of the reason behind that is that its owners have reinvested significantly to ensure it remains at the vanguard of the Japanese scene. In 2022, it expanded its offerings to include a fourth floor, but importantly, the spacious club managed to retain its intimate vibe. From tech-house to trance, hip-hop to R&B, WARP hosts diverse weekly and monthly events, complemented by special international tours. Situated in Tokyo's bustling nightlife district, each floor has its own distinct atmosphere, and between them offer a range of experiences, from high-energy EDM to ambient retreats. The venue’s production is one of the best in the region too, with cutting-edge sound and lighting systems, including the iconic Solar System visual rig, which elevates each night alongside the futuristic decor and stellar resident DJs such as Swagger, Max and Rhy, who continue to push boundaries and captivate clubbers from around the world. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
38	OMNIA	Las Vegas, USA	4,300	taogroup.com/venues/omnia-nightclub-las-vegas	Las Vegas is all about the glamour and the glitz, and they don’t come much glitzier or more glamorous than OMNIA. Set right on the Strip in the famed Caesars Palace, this 75,000-foot, capacious club sprawls across three levels that include the ultra-lounge, the eye-popping Main Room (with its impressive kinetic chandelier), the Heart of OMNIA room, and balcony, plus a rooftop terrace that boasts sweeping views of the vibrant Vegas skyline. Now in its ninth year, OMNIA’s bookings match its dazzling surroundings, drawing from the starriest names in EDM and house. In the last year alone, Zedd, Tiësto, Alesso, Martin Garrix, Steve Aoki, Loud Luxury, FISHER, Cedric Gervais and NGHTMRE have all played at the venue, while previous headliners have included Lost Frequencies, Chris Lake and John Summit. Open Tuesday, Thursday, Friday and Saturday, the end of the week is reserved for Deseo Latin Sundays, where clubbers are regaled with Latin-inspired sounds.  Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
39	DupleX	Prague, Czech Republic	2,500		duplex.cz Every night of the week, the world’s most prestigious EDM DJs come and play at DupleX, The Rooftop Club, a luxury nightclub overlooking Wenceslas Square, a place where students once protested against the country’s communist government. Steve Aoki, Timmy Trumpet, NERVO, Fedde Le Grand, Vini Vici, Purple Disco Machine and Jay Hardway have been a handful of highlights from the past year, not to mention DupleX’s own high-profile resident DJs, who build lasting connections with these international stars. Following DVLM’s inaugural set at the club last October, for example, resident DJs Andrea Pomeje and Mairee released a record together on the Belgian-Greek duo’s label Smash The House, further progressing DupleX’s relevance in the world of EDM. And 2024 is set to be equally ambitious for this leading superclub, with Tiësto recently headlining Easter weekend. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
40	Sel Octagon	Tokyo, Japan	700		sel-octagon-tokyo.jp SEL OCTAGON in Tokyo celebrates its fifth anniversary in 2024, rounding out a year that saw the club book a number of heavy hitters, including Afrojack, Don Diablo, Jonas Blue, Sam Feldt, KSHMR, and Sub Zero Project. From the team behind legendary Seoul nightclub, Octagon, SEL OCTAGON consists of a main room and a lounge space, with the venue designed to be what the team describe as an "indoor festival". The club is kitted out with a “three-dimensional" Void sound system, and has recently seen an upgrade to its lighting and production with the addition of an elaborate laser system that lights up SEL OCTAGON’s dancefloor. Residents include music director, KDH, jeonghyeon, and Mr.Black, while forthcoming bookings include Joyryde, 22Bullets, and Ryan Spicer. This year’s fifth anniversary also sees the club throw a full weekend of celebrations that welcome Danny Avila, Showtek and Dimitri Vangelis & Wyman to perform. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
41	AVALON Hollywood	Los Angeles, CA, USA	1,000	avalonhollywood.com	Avalon Hollywood has been a cornerstone of Los Angeles’ nightlife since 1927. The venue’s Spanish Colonial architecture connects its trendsetting present with its storied past. On the cutting-edge of technology, Avalon Hollywood undergoes regular upgrades. This past year saw the installation of a Native 4K main LED screen, four 30-watt lasers and a Pioneer A9 mixer. A recent partnership with Insomniac Events, North America’s leading electronic dance music brand, has Avalon Hollywood hosting a cross-genre spread of nights: Factory 93 (techno), Bassrush (bass music), Basscon (hardstyle), Lost in Dreams (melodic bass) and HARD (UK garage). Avalon Hollywood also has its flagship events: Emo Nite, Gasolina (Latin), Dance Yourself Clean (indie dance) and Feel So Close (2010s EDM). Among the DJs who have hit the decks at Avalon Hollywood in the last year are Boys Noize, Kaskade, Markus Schulz, Guiseppe Ottavianni, Maya Jane Coles, Claude VonStroke, Lee Burridge, Will Clarke, and Carl Craig. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
42	Ai Nightclub	Taipei	700	instagram.com/ai.nightclub	Ai Nightclub emerged from a former mini-concert hall and is spearheaded by Taiwan's nightlife maven, Junior Lin. It is now the island’s largest nightclub and has continued to ascend over the past 18 months thanks to bookings including James Hype, VINAI, Will Sparks, and many more. Not only does Ai lead in terms of music in the region, but also with its design and technology, which are right at the cutting edge. In collaboration with Howard Liao Design, it offers up sleek modernity, along with innovative lighting in the form of a high-definition LED DJ booth, movable LED ceiling, and dynamic LED beams. DJ Junior, renowned on Asia's festival circuit and in places like Las Vegas, is a key resident, as is Lynne, a star of the prog and melodic scene. As of this year, the club is open five nights a week, allowing the time for an even broader palette of sounds. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
43	Boomerang	Hong Kong	450	boomeranghkg.com	First opening the doors of this former-Hard Rock Cafe in time for Halloween 2020, team Boomerang had to overcome huge challenges at a very early age. Apparently lockdowns, pandemic cancellations, and, most probably, wild horses couldn't stop the juggernaut, with residents like Karlie, Yaat, iLtik, Hansel, and Brandon helping establish the venue as a beacon for electronic music in Hong Kong. Flying the flag for intimate, high-spec, single-room sessions, names like Lost Frequencies, Vinai, Mike Williams, Vini Vici, Nicky Romero, Slander, Vicetone, Brooks, Meduza, Wasback, and Joel Corry have all graced the booth recently. Indicative of how broad the music policy can be — a cornerstone of the address — expect a soundtrack running from bouncy, driving house, to progressive, trance, tech, rave and EDM. The club has also launched its own label, Distinct Records, which was set up in 2023 to push similar sounds. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
44	1900 LE THÉÂTRE	Hanoi, Vietnam	1,500	instagram.com/1900.hn	Located in the former building of the historic Quang Lac Theatre in Hanoi, ​​1900 LE THÉÂTRE — known to locals as 1900 — is the largest club in Vietnam’s capital city. Retaining its place inside the top 50 clubs in the world for a third year running, the venue also operates two record labels, Dusted Recordings and 1900 Records, which have released music from young producer V.I.B, Chariot, KODEINE and Trayden. Having recently extended the club's opening hours until 2AM, 1900 LE THÉÂTRE books a range of local and international DJs. These include Juz Kevin hosting 1900’s DJ Station event, a huge headline performance from London-based drum & bass artist DIMENSION, and Jay Hardway and B Jones both performing as part of the DJ Mag Top 100 Clubs tour. The venue also hosts a series of student events, and the club’s Pop Buster night, which puts on themed parties around artists such as Ariana Grande and The Weeknd. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
45	Crobar	Buenos Aires, Argentina	2,300	crobar.com.ar	Part of a clubbing brand with three outposts in North American cities New York, Miami and Chicago, Buenos Aires superclub Crobar could be the best of the lot. The venue, perched in the upscale Palermo district, has attracted international attention thanks to its futuristic decor, which merges an industrial aesthetic with luxurious details. An LED ceiling, laser-strafed walls and multiple floors add to the effect, while an opulent chillout room, replete with arched ceiling, completes the picture. None of this would matter if the bookings weren’t up to scratch. In the last few months, European techno heroes like Chris Liebing and Len Faki have appeared at the club, alongside house heads such as Dan Ghenacia, Chris Stussy and Enzo Siragusa. When not booking guests from abroad, the club foregrounds Argentinian talent such as Santiago García, Muter, Victoria Engel and D3FAI. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
46	Zouk Las Vegas	Las Vegas, NV, USA	2,200	zoukgrouplv.com	It doesn't get much more iconic than Zouk. Located in the heart of the Vegas strip, the club's three rooms, all powered by state-of-the-art L-Acoustics sound systems, come together to form one of the city's preeminent superclubs. 2023 was another benchmark year for the US outpost of the Singaporean clubbing institution. Regular performances from the likes of KASKADE, DJ Snake, deadmau5, Ludacris, and RL Grime showcased its versatility and range, and 2024 promises to be even bigger. Already, the club has added Illenium, James Hype, Meduza and T-Pain to its residents roster. But what also sets Zouk apart from some of Vegas' other venues is its commitment to its larger community. On Thursdays, you'll find that the bookings tend to be more focused on local talent, with a night catering to Sin City’s diverse industry crowd. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
47	Space Plus	Bangkok, Thailand	2,000	spaceplusbkk.com	Space Plus Bangkok lies at the heart of Royal City Avenue, the Thai capital’s main partying district boasting some of the city’s best nighttime entertainment. Though relatively new, the superclub has more than held its own over the years by offering punters a visual and sonic experience designed to feel out of this world. The light and sound production is on a scale hard to come by, with lasers and smoke machines that marry perfectly with the club’s hardstyle and EDM programming. With VIP and standing tables that line a dancefloor for some 2,000 clubbers, Space Plus Bangkok has, since its opening in 2022, taken the city’s nightlife to another level, with shows by international acts like Cali Swag District, Killshot and Romeo Blanco. Let’s see what the team behind this nex-gen club has in store for the years to come. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
48	Aquarius	Zrće Beach, Croatia	2,000		aquarius.club It's fair to say that without Aquarius and its sister clubs on Zrće Beach on the island of Pag, the summer scene in Croatia wouldn't be half as vibrant. What was once a small bar more than 20 years ago is now at the heart of many festival operations, from Hideout to Sonus to Barrakud. It boasts open-air pools, wooden decks, spectacular views out to sea, and beefy sound systems that run from dusk till dawn and have welcomed a real who's who of international talent — from ARTBAT to Marco Faraone, Reinier Zonneveld, Tijana T and many more. As well as the big-name events, in-house promotions also offer up EDM stars, and around a million people a year are estimated to pass through its doors and party under its palm trees. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
49	Marquee Nightclub & Dayclub	Las Vegas, NV, USA	3,000 (Nightclub), 1,600 (Dayclub)taogroup.com/venues/marquee-las-vegas		They say what happens in Vegas stays in Vegas, but the reputation of Marquee Nightclub & Dayclub has travelled far and wide since it first began to usher in a new wave of EDM stars. Located in The Cosmopolitan Hotel on the city’s famous strip, the venue boasts seven bars and three different rooms for its nighttime activities: The Main Room, The Boom Box and The Library. Daytime ravers, meanwhile, are served by two pools on the rooftop deck, where a world-class sound system soundtracks the fun under the Nevada sun. And, if for some reason that’s not shining, have no fear, because The Marquee Dome also offers a year-round indoor pool party experience. Keeping punters entertained is a revolving cast of top jocks, which includes regulars such as trance aficionado Audien, Timmy Trumpet, Mustard, and MTV star and New Jersey’s finest, Pauly D.  Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
50	LOD	Kathmandu, Nepal	2,500	clublod.com	LOD is located in a city — Kathmandu — that is perhaps not immediately known for its dance music clubs, but the venue’s d&b audiotechnik sound system, state-of-the-art hydraulic lights system and its cutting-edge production and staging have made it one of South Asia’s most exciting venues. Opened in 2019 in a 9,600-square-foot former car park, LOD’s concept is to blend a rock bar and electronic music night club, with its multi-purpose design set up for both DJing and live performance. LOD puts on one-off and regular events, from club nights featuring international DJs and acts, to nights promoting emerging Nepalese artists. In the past, LOD has booked DJs including Timmy Trumpet, Tom & Collins, Plastik Funk, Quintino, Mr Pig, and Ayo, and notable appearances so far this year include Wasback, Burak Yeter, Nobilee and Rachana Dahal. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
51	D-Edge	São Paulo, Brazil	1,000	d-edge.com.br	Turning 24 in 2024, D-Edge is one of Brazil’s longest-running and most-lauded electronic music clubs — and one of the most instantly recognisable on the planet. The São Paulo space’s iconic LED-laced design was groundbreaking when it first launched and still leads the way, looking like something from a futuristic sci-fi film. Originally just the one room, the club now also encompasses a lounge area and terrace, and this year will have its roof renovated to enable daytime events taking in the beautiful view. Sound by Brazilian company KW Audio and Funktion-One adds to the sumptuous sensory experience inside the club, the design of which is led by Muti Randolph. But what about the music? Well alongside club founder and legendary DJ Renato Ratier, there’s been a long list of top talent keeping the club busy three nights per week over the past year, including Mochakk, Seth Troxler, Traumer, Anabel Englund, tINI, Tiga, Marco Faraone, Boys Noize, Sonja Moonear, Âme, Margaret Dygas, and many more. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
52	MAD Club	Lausanne, Switzerland	1,800		mad.club Located in a former locksmith's shop in the heart of Lausanne, MAD Club first opened its doors way back in 1985 and has since grown into a 2,000-capacity space spanning five floors, four dancefloors, and even a restaurant. Jumping up seven places this year, the club has expanded and upgraded its 800-capacity, electro and house-focused second room, JetLag, with the addition of a new sound system and lighting. Alongside its chandelier floor and Turbosound floodlight, MAD Club's main room has been kitted out with a new LED screen and a kinetic light engine. The converted warehouse space has seen a huge array of international artists perform over the last year, including Bob Sinclar, DJs From Mars, Michael Grey, Offenbach, and Fatal Bazooka. MAD Club has also expanded its residents roster, which now boasts Igor Blaska, Fabian Air, Don Pepe, Vkee Madison, Nika, Kiff One, Miss Tyk, Othello, Marco Silva, Tony Big, and Juiceppe. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
53	Soudcheck	Washington, DC, USA	500	soundcheckdc.com	The younger sibling of superclub Echostage, Soundcheck is Club GLOW’s intimate, underground experience. Located in the downtown area of the nation’s capital, the 4,400-square-foot basement space showcases up-and-coming talent in a high-level environment, with state-of-the-art lighting and 80,000 watts of sound. Soundcheck is the pre- and post-Project GLOW Festival destination, featuring appearances from the festival’s line-up. It also hosts Insomniac’s Bassrush, a weekly night of bass music. Soundcheck does not discriminate between styles and genres, featuring everything from house to hip-hop and Latin, and offering table service as well as a banging dancefloor. Among the talent gracing the Soundcheck stage this past year are names like Gorgon City, Mau P, Hamdi, Sicaria, Max Styler, Tini Gessler, Chris Avantgarde, PAWSA, LP Giobbi, Eli Brown and testpilot. Additionally, Soundcheck counts Markus Schulz, Infected Mushroom, Ferry Corsten, Funtcase, DJ Soda, Green Velvet, and more among its resident DJs. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
54	Opium	Barcelona, Spain	3,000	opiumbarcelona.com	Opened in 2007, Opium Barcelona has weathered the ups and downs of nearly two decades to become one of the city’s go-tos for live music and DJs. Its four room setup offers plenty of choice. The Main Room is has hosted artists including Claptone or Oliver Heldens. The Dawn Room caters for VIPs, with both a dancefloor and terrace. The Cave houses a more underground vibe, literally, its low ceilings lending it an intimate, heads-down atmosphere. And The Terrace takes advantage of the club’s beachside location; an alfresco place to chill and chat while the party carries on inside. If all that sounds like something you shouldn’t undertake on an empty stomach, then you can also check out the club’s beachfront terrace, with a restaurant offering the best in Mediterranean gastronomy to enjoy while taking in the fresh sea air. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
55	Amnesia Cap d’Agde	Cap d’Agde, France	3,000		amnesia.fr Created in 1984 and situated in the south of France, Amnesia Cap d’Agde is a Mediterranean, open-air, purpose-built club that harks back to the style of a Greek theatre in its design, with an L-Acoustic sound system and multiple LED screens surrounding. In the past 12 months, the club has been building up to an extra exciting summer in 2024, after purchasing the adjacent land and creating an extension to give increase its capacity, the quality of guest DJs and VIP experience. The likes of David Guetta, Armin van Buuren and Timmy Trumpet have played there this past year, flanked by residents Ceeryl Chardonnay, Fred Pellichero, Sty and Grosso Modo. On the whole, key nights feature electronic music headliners with much celebration and pazazz, while Prestige Sundays bring hip-hop party vibes with an equal amount of joy and happiness displayed. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
56	Hakkasan	Las Vegas, NV, USA	3,900	hakkasan.com/las-vegas	For over a decade, Hakkasan has remained one of Sin City’s most well-known venues, and one of its most visited nightlife destinations. Each of Hakkasan’s four rooms: Main, Pavilion, Level 3 Club and Level 3 Lounge, offers an entirely unique experience for clubbers and diners alike, with slick decor and ambience for every mood. It is not unexpected to see celebrities of all stripes bumping to the beats in this 10,000-square-foot space. Hakkasan keeps the aural experience top-notch with an Audiotek sound system and Turbosound speakers. But the club’s primary attraction is visual: the Hakkasan Grid is a multimillion-dollar, custom-built kinetic light installation, consisting of 57 feet of seamless and sculptural custom-made pixel-mapped LED triangles. Hakkasan keeps its doors open from Thursday through Saturday, with artists including Lil Jon, Steve Aoki, Tyga, Murda Beatz, 4B, Loud Luxury, Sofi Tukker and Timmy Trumpet as its selectors. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
57	The Grand Factory	Beirut, Lebanon	1,350	factory-people.com/The-Grand-Factory	Beirut’s Grand Factory has endured numerous challenges in recent years, but has kept the music alive — a testament to the passion and dedication of its team. The club’s Funktion-One-fitted, 1,000-cap main room, Factory, boasts a fixed kinetic lighting rig that’s been expanded in the past year, creating “a more immersive experience on the dancefloor”, says general manager Samer Makarem. Second room, Reunion, holds 250 people and boasts a Stage Accompany Soundsystem with Analogue Feedback technology; while Soul Kitchen serves up cocktails and music. Sounds range from local bands at Friday Night Live to the “glitz and glam disco” of Love Night, the “guilty pleasures” of House of Pop, and the modern pop and Afro-house of House Call. But the beating heart is 2ND SUN, the club’s “weekly electronic ritual”. Over the past year, international acts like Adam Port, Mind Against, Magdalena, Shimza, and Henri Bergmann have played alongside the extensive roster of residents: Tala, Vanclod, Rita, Wass, Bibz, Rolbac, Nareg, Jean, Allen Behlok, Romax, Tia, and club founder Jade. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
58	Nitsa	Barcelona, Spain	1,000	nitsa.com	Nitsa was born in 1994, and is located inside Sala Apolo, Barcelona’s quintessential concert venue and former cabaret theatre space. The club thrives on nurturing local artists and crews, as well as booking international DJs and takeovers. It’s home to Barcelona FLINT (female, lesbian, intersex, trans and agender) collective MARICAS, who this year celebrated their sixth anniversary with OK Williams and D.Tiffany alongside residents ISAbella and more. As well as getting your fix of house and techno acts, there are occasional nights programmed with drum & bass, plus you can find Caribbean and African grooves at parties such as Jokko and Poly-Rythmo. In the past 12 months, the club has welcomed Berlin queer collective Herrensauna, Dekmantel’s club tour, and a diverse range of artists like Joe Claussell, Avalon Emerson, Yaeji, Optimo, The Hacker, Marcel Dettmann and VTSS. Upcoming bookings include Helena Hauff, CRYSTALLMESS, Raresh B2B Francesco Del Garda, and Eris Drew.  Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
59	Ministry Of Fun	Banská Bystrica, Slovakia	1,600		ministryoffun.sk Until recently, Slovakia hasn’t featured on most people’s clubbing itineraries — but that’s set to change, thanks to Ministry Of Fun. The midsized venue in the small city of Banská Bystrica has actually been running for 15 years, though a recent refurb during the Covid shutdown brought in not just new decor but a Cybermotion intelligent moving speed chain hoist that circulates LED lights around the club. It was the first club to install an L-Acoustics K1 sound system, which pumps out a varied array of styles, from trance, techno and hardstyle to drum & bass, while high-profile bookings, including Deborah De Luca, Nora En Pure, Sub Focus, Paul van Dyk and Hedex, have attracted international attention. The venue also runs two resident nights: Ministry Of House, helmed by Dave Eremias, Emty, Anndy, Mustee and Izzy, and Video Oldies with Rudo Tucek, a regularly sold-out event with a soundtrack of hits from the ’80s through the 2000s.  Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
60	Farout Beach Club	Ios Island, Greece	2,500	faroutbeachclub.com	Christos Mykoniatis founded FarOut Beach Club to “reignite the youthful spirit that once thrived on Mylopotas Beach during the liberating decades of the ’60s and ’70s”. Today, Mykoniatis’ sons Makis and Mimis run the venue, continuing to cultivate a “new-age paradise” decked out with a pool, restaurant, luxury accommodation, and a large-scale nightclub. With a gorgeous backdrop of the Aegean Sea, FarOut Beach Club has brought many renowned talents to this stunning Greek island, including Peggy Gou, Mau P, GORDO, Timmy Trumpet and Will Sparks. Creating memorable parties powered by a Funktion-One sound system, the club offers an immersive experience with an escapist feel. Catering for holidaymakers and locals with a penchant for house, techno, disco and everything in between, it’s an unparalleled playground complete with golden sands and crystal-clear waters. And the best thing about the daytime parties? They’re free to attend. A must if you're passing through the Cyclades islands. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
61	Phi Beach	Baja Sardinia, Italy	1,600	phibeach.com	Open since 2008, Phi Beach is a magnificent open-air club with picturesque views across the Mediterranean Sea. It’s located inside the ancient military fortress of Forte Cappellini, which dates back to the 1800s. This year, the club introduced an intimate new 150-capacity space called The Rock that will run until 2AM, and a new DJ booth on the beach has also been built. In the last 12 months, Phi Beach invited Black Coffee, Tale Of Us, Peggy Gou and more to play alongside its trusted residents. Aiming to reach new heights, the club has plans to launch a festival and a record label in motion.  Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
62	Warehouse	Nantes, France	2,500		warehouse-nantes.fr Located in the historic cultural hotspot Hangar à Bananes, Warehouse is a former shipping hangar transformed by three industry experts and divided into two rooms. The main room includes a French-Italian sound system by MDC, while the second room boasts a Funktion-One setup. In the last year, the Warehouse team has launched a new 360° stage and booked legendary names from Laurent Garnier, Ellen Allien and Chase & Status to emerging talents like Trym, Sara Landry and Kabylie Minogue. Key nights include Under, Nantes Rave Techno, and Terror Jungle, offering a discernible mix of melodic techno, industrial techno, and house, respectively. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
63	ZEROTOKYO	Tokyo, Japan	1,500		zerotokyo.jp Tokyo’s lively Kabukicho neighbourhood is home to the city’s newest nightlife venue, ZEROTOKYO. Opening its doors in spring of 2023, ZEROTOKYO bills itself as the “entertainment junction”, and it certainly is that, with over 100 Adamson Systems Engineering speakers on each floor and Cosmic Lab providing a multi-sensory visual experience. Spread over three levels and five areas, the architecture and design of its ornate R Bar, strip club-like Z Lounge, no-expense-spared Z Hall, glitzy Ring and even the red-tinged entrance give a futuristic feel to ZEROTOKYO. It hosts international acts such as Jeff Mills, Oliver Heldens and Nina Kraviz, but ZEROTOKYO’s key night is its Thursday party, Sparks. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
64	Club Galame	Foshan City, China	2,000	instagram.com/club_galame_official	Situated in an old abandoned factory, Club Galame, is Southeast China's premier home of clubbing. Across its four expansive rooms, the club counts a roster of both local and international superstar guests, and wasted no time getting the biggest and best of the latter when China’s Covid restrictions were finally lifted early in 2023. Highlights from last year included Armin van Buuren, W&W, KSHMR, SLANDER, MaRLo, Yellow Claw, KAAZE, 4B, AXMO, TroyBoi, Sefa, Villain, Ran-D, and Keltek, to name just a few. But 2023 was also a year of seachange for the club. The Club Galame team decided to completely rebuild the venue, taking everything down and starting over from scratch. Now the club starts 2024 on the precipice of a relaunch, having signed residents Kaiju, Beto, Meguru, and Ram onto its roster to help shepherd the renowned venue into a completely new era of Chinese clubbing. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
65	The Grand	Boston, MA, USA	1,000	thegrandboston.com	Despite its East Coast location, Vegas fanfare awaits at The Grand. The plush aesthetic and top-tier line-ups at this Seaport District haunt are favoured by bottle-service crowds who roll up for residents like Kaskade, 50 Cent, Armin van Buuren, Steve Aoki and Don Diablo. However, club-goers with underground tastes got an upgrade recently, too. “In 2023, we introduced a new room that offers a more intimate, in-the-round-style clubbing experience,” shares Big Night Entertainment’s director of nightlife marketing, Christina Najm. On Wednesdays, this side stage is all about house music, but A-list glamour has reigned supreme in the main venue since 2017, where a custom 178-piece kinetic lighting system, 70-foot wraparound LED wall and shimmering chandeliers evoke shouts of, “Viva Las Boston, baby!” Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
66	Pitt Club	Kuala Lumpur, Malaysia	1200	www.pittclubkl.com	Brand new Malaysian venue Pitt Club only opened in July 2023, but has already made a substantial impact on Kuala Lumpur nightlife. Open from Wednesday through Sunday, the club puts on a mix of mainstream, hip-hop/R&B and EDM events, and since opening has booked DJs including Nicky Romero, Dannic, Mariana BO, Dr. Phunk, Marnik, Wukong, and Bassjackers. Previously an event hall, the space has been completely transformed into a futuristic venue featuring a single 15,000-square-foot circular main room that is graced by a custom Tecnare sound system and kinetic LED lighting system, the first of its kind in Malaysia. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
67	Drumsheds	London, UK	15,000	drumshedslondon.com	Broadwick Live (the company behind Printworks) smashed back into clubland last autumn with the launch of its latest iteration of Drumsheds at a disused Ikea store in Tottenham, North London. The warehouse venue has three rooms (X, Y and Z), each with its own unique layout, as well as an expansive outdoor space and a covered parking lot that allows for open-air events to take place in any weather. The Hydra, False Idols, D&B event Worried About Henry and Skepta and Jammer’s Más Tiempo brand are just a handful of those that have sold out shows at Drumsheds in the last six months. The fact Broadwick Live consistently manages to fill this gargantuan venue speaks to the curation, the effective use of space, and London’s thirst for clubbing on the largest of scales. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
68	Rex Club	Paris, France	800	rexclub.com	Rex Club started out in the 1930s as an art deco cinema. In the late ’80s it started putting on acid house nights, and when French legend Laurent Garnier returned to Paris in the early ’90s after a spell in Manchester he started throwing his Wake Up! parties there, which helped properly kick off the city’s electronic dance music scene. Since then Rex has made its reputation as a premier place for dance music in the French capital, with the likes of Daft Punk and various Ed Banger artists all playing memorable shows there. Former resident DJs have included Dyed Soundorom, D'Julz and Jennifer Cardini, while more recently Acid Arab, John Talabot and others have held down regular spots. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
69	Eden	Ibiza, Spain	4,000	edenibiza.com	2024 marks a quarter of a century in operation for Eden, one of Ibiza's most recognisable clubs. Over those 25 years, it has done it all, from hosting big-name pop icons like Lady Gaga to contemporary electronic music tastemakers like Disclosure. It has also long been home to Shine, one of Ibiza's most prestigious trance parties, with regular guests like Paul van Dyk. At the same time, tech-house crew Abode and drum & bass night Worried About Henry regularly push the venue's Void Incubus system to the max, and Eden has integrated music recognition technology so artists whose tunes get played are rewarded for their contributions. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
70	Cafe Del Mar	Phuket, Thailand	2,850	phuket.cafedelmar.com	Where the beach meets the party pretty much sums up the location for Café Del Mar in Thailand. One of the dreamiest of hedonistic hotspots, Café Del Mar Phuket is situated on the beach of Kamala. Opened up in 2017, it has since welcomed many renowned DJs, and most recently the likes of Sven Väth, Nina Kraviz, Sam Divine, Dixon and Dubfire played the venue. There’s an outside area, which naturally allows for higher numbers, and an inside space that’s a tad more snug. The venue’s fancy restaurant, along with resident DJs Mr Sour, Ekanan, Hebdonis and Eli Cicada, all play a part in the making of this most excellent club destination. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
71	Time	Costa Mesa, CA, USA	738	timenightclub.com	Time Nightclub in Orange County climbs a further seven places in this year’s poll. Located in a former Nike flagship store, the venue boasts a Funktion-One sound system and a "ladies’ lounge" with a private bar, with the design of the club revolving around a huge chandelier that hangs over the dancefloor, made up of Chauvet MotionOrb lighting fixtures and Elation Pixel Bars controlled by MADRIX Software. This year has seen the club — which plans to expand its dancefloor in the near future — book EDM heavyweights including Afrojack, Dimitri Vegas, Steve Aoki, Malaa, and Shiba San, as well as run its popular ’00s-themed party, Flashback. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
72	WOMB	Tokyo, Japan	800		womb.co.jp Opened in 2000, WOMB is Tokyo’s ultimate dance music destination. Based in the Shibuya district and reached through an unassuming side street, it’s a hub for underground house, techno and other styles that in the last year has booked international talent like Ivan Smagghe, Binh, dBridge and Fred P. The main room is a three-floor atrium, while on the first and fourth floor of the club there are two further rooms that spotlight Tokyo’s upcoming DJs. The fourth-floor space was recently renovated, adding new seating areas and an immersive dancefloor. Clubbers also visit for its exceptional residents, including techno selector DJ Nobu, drum & bass boss DJ AKi, DJ Sodeyama and Drunken Kong.  Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
73	Marquee	Singapore. Singapore	2,127	marqueesingapore.com	A new entry to the poll, Marquee Singapore is run by the team behind the Marquee venues in New York, Las Vegas and Sydney. Located in Marina Bay Sands, the venue is Singapore's largest club, with a three-storey spiral slide and an eight-armed indoor ferris wheel that features a photo booth in every pod. Located in the former space of an MBS theatre, Marquee Singapore celebrates its fifth anniversary in April. The venue packs a festival-like experience into a club, with artists including Tiësto, NERVO, Will Sparks, Chung Ha and Bruno Mars all recently passing through, and it also hosts themed nights that feature dress codes like “Galactic Glam”. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
74	Razzmatazz	Barcelona, Spain	3,000	salarazzmatazz.com	Razzmatazz is a club that celebrates the foundations of electronic music, while also embracing the sounds of the future. In 2023, it collaborated with more than 1,000 artists, booking DJs from across the spectrum — Ben Sims, Dr. Rubinstein, Interplanetary Criminal, LSDXOXO, Octave One, Paula Temple and UNIIQU3 all played its hallowed halls — and did away with the resident DJ role, opting instead to work with a wider roster of DJs from across the Spanish scene. Collaborations with collectives and labels remain at the heart of this venue’s ethos, which is why it continues to return to the Top 100 Clubs list. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
75	FOMO	Baku, Azerbaijan	500	fomobaku.com	In the past year, Azerbaijan clubbing has irrevocably changed. Since opening its doors in late 2023, FOMO has become the centre of gravity for house and techno in the country's capital, Baku. Powered by a state-of-the-art d&b Audiotechnik sound system, the club's emphasis is on the finest in underground dance music, bringing everyone from Âme to Leo Pol to the city by the Caspian Sea. If 2023 was the year that introduced FOMO to the world, the club is already capitalising on its launch momentum, inviting some of the underground's most cutting-edge artists this year, such as Zombies in Miami, Cromby, and Mano Le Tough.  Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
76	Elsewhere	Brooklyn, NY, USA	2,000+	elsewherebrooklyn.com	Elsewhere has spent the past year chugging along as one of NYC’s prime locations for both DJ-led parties and live music, with a focus on the underground end of the spectrum — “radical nights for radical days ahead”, as the venue’s motto goes. Its vision of what’s “radical” in terms of deck talent is impressively broad, with DJs like The Blessed Madonna, a tag-teaming Hudson Mohawke and Nikki Nair, and DJ Mag cover stars Coco & Breezy all plying their trade within the club’s four rooms in recent months. The crown, somewhat literally, is the club’s super fun rooftop, which this season will be hosting Detroit’s Floorplan, the house traditionalists of Soul Summit, and jungle devotee Nia Archives, among others. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
77	Tresor	Berlin, Germany	1,000	tresorberlin.com	Undoubtedly one of Berlin’s most treasured clubs since its inception in 1991, Tresor returns to the poll for another year. In the basement, clubbers can enjoy techno and electro in all its forms, from Sunil Sharpe and DJ Stingray 313 to resident DJs like Chloe Lula and Kerrie. A slew of imprints, like WIGS and International Chrome, have hosted the floor too. Every Wednesday night, New Faces spotlights rising techno artists, while upstairs in Globus, it’s a lighter affair. Labels like Rings of Neptune and OYE Records have played the room, with plenty more brilliant names and platforms lined up for 2024. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
78	Home	Sydney, Australia	2,500	homesydney.com	Overlooking Sydney’s grand Darling Harbour, Home is a three-level, purpose-built superclub that's been serving the city for over two decades. One of only a few Australian venues to ever make the Top 100 Clubs poll, its music policy is suitably broad, with d&b and UKG rubbing shoulders with reggaeton, hard dance and even a male revue show. Fedde Le Grande was amongst the stars who also passed through in 2024, closing Home’s Mardi Gras celebrations. Homemade, the club’s in-house Saturday night, offers mini-festival vibes every week over four rooms. And for those who don’t want to stop, Morning Glory takes advantage of the location for a stunning sunrise session. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
79	Beachclub	Montréal, Canada	10,000	beachclub.com	Opened in 1995, Beachclub, situated 25 minutes’ drive from central Montréal, is North America’s largest outdoor club. In the words of its owners, Beachclub is more of a “party island” than just a venue, and its huge beachfront location encompasses multiple rooms, terraces, bars, and VIP areas. It really comes to life in the summer months, and with its huge capacity, it books only the biggest names. In the last year, David Guetta headlined, and tickets sold out in a minute and a half, while other stars to play at Beachclub include EDM artists Martin Garrix, Alesso and Zedd, and household names like Sean Paul. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
80	Sound	Los Angeles, CA, USA	500	soundnightclub.com	We love ourselves a sunken dancefloor, but the one at the Hollywood nitery Sound is but one of the myriad reasons why this standby has been packing them in since it’s 2013 debut. There’s the top-tier sound system; there’s the lighting system; there’s even refurbished wood panelling from a home of Frank Sinatra. But what really brings party people into its 8,000-square-foot space are the line-ups; the past few months have seen everyone from the UK-born, Ibiza-based Nightmares On Wax to NYC house hero Todd Terry to West Coast heroes like Miguel Migs and Marques Wyatt working their magic. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
81	POCPOC Garden	Ho Chi Minh City, Vietnam	1,100	facebook.com/pocpocgarden	POC POC GARDEN has always focused on getting the all-important basics right; what was a vacant urban space in 2020 is now a club decked out with an advanced Martin Audio sound system, and sleek, modern decor with eye-catching art installations. As well as hosting the biggest EDM names and events in the region, the club also welcomes dance crews from Cuba, and has a giant water tank with daily mermaid performances and many other spectacular visual affairs that make use of a huge ceiling hoist system. It is unique, to say the least. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
82	After Caposile	Venice, Italy	800		aftercaposile.it Located on former farmland, After Caposile boasts two open-air garden stages in summer, and an indoor club for the winter months that is lovingly known as the “spaceship” and opened in 2019 inside a renovated farmhouse. Described as a "magic garden" by its team, Chris Stussy, Apollonia, Franco Cinelli, ZIP, David Morales, Satoshi Tomiie, tINI, Sonja Moonear, Enzo Siragusa, Praslesh, Rossi., and East End Dubs have all played on After Caposile’s d&b Audiotechnik sound system recently. Resident DJs include Francesco Maddalena, Maggio, Manuel De Lorenzi, Yaar Kü, Twineffect, and Miss Wallace. Having opened a second outdoor stage in 2023, the team hope to launch a second indoor space later this year. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
83	MUZE	Nairobi, Kenya	400	muzeclub.com	Electric Avenue is Nairobi’s nightlife hub — a loud thoroughfare of bars, booze and beats in the busy Westlands district. A corner of town where hedonism is the norm, historically many of the most significant dancefloors in the city have based themselves here. Five-year-old MUZE is one example. Although guests come from across the world, bookings lean towards artists from Africa and its diaspora, with selectors like Thakzin, Bun Xapa and Zerb taking the roof off in 2023 via the finely tuned Funktion-One rig. Already one of Kenya’s leading spaces for four-to-the-floor, a transformational refurbishment has now pushed those high standards further. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
84	Versuz	Hasselt, Belgium	3,000		versuz.be VERSUZ is always looking to improve. In 2013, it started life anew as a superclub in the sprawling resort of Park H. Between 2020 and 2022, the team bolstered the club’s already opulent decor with a new LED wall and state-of-the-art PK Sound audio system. Now it’s a dream venue for both the world’s biggest EDM DJs and the club’s long list of resident DJs. With this consistent mix of superstars and rising talent, VERSUZ continues to place itself among the biggest and best clubs in the world without ever losing sight of its community close to home. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
85	De School	Amsterdam, Netherlands	750		deschoolamsterdam.nl De School has long been a lynchpin of the Amsterdam scene. The club that was indeed once a school is a warren-like space with different rooms that offer some proper no-nonsense clubbing experiences, complete with belching smoke machines, sweaty atmospheres, and the best house and techno DJs in the underground. It also offers visual and art installations, sculpture, a lovely garden area... but not anymore. After closing in 2020, it later reopened for a final 16-month run, which ended in January 2024. Since April this year, the space has become a new club, Tilla Tec, complete with a queer-focused tattoo parlour and gym, studio spaces, and even a coffee roasting company. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
86	Nova	San Diego, CA, USA	1,180	novasd.com	Acquired by Pasquale Rotella’s Insomniac Events in 2022, NOVA SD is a sister club to Exchange LA, and is located on the former site of Omnia Nightclub in San Diego's Gaslamp Quarter. Climbing six places in the poll this year, the venue features an L’Acoustics sound system and has seen Timmy Trumpet, Patrick Topping, Nicole Moudaber, Alan Walker, San Holo, Deorro, Madeon, Lily Palmer, Green Velvet, Layton Giordani, Steve Aoki, KSHMR, Sub Focus, and Afrojack all perform recently. Nights at NOVA SD include Factory 93, Dreamstate, Bassrush, Lost in Dreams, Day Trip, Insomniac, Space Yacht and Gasolina, as well as the popular ’90/’00s-themed party, Time Machine. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
87	Koko	London, UK	1,410		koko.co.uk Pass by KOKO, situated at the Mornington Crescent end of Camden High Street, in the early evenings and you’ll likely find a huge queue outside. This is due to the on-point bookings that have helped invigorate the London scene since it reopened in April 2022 after a devastating fire in 2020. Just some of the highlights from the last 12 months: Kerri Chandler’s four-week residency, The Weeknd’s official afterparty with Kaytranada, a Laurent Garnier special disco set, No Art with ANOTR, Ben UFO curates, Jeff Mills, amapiano sensation Uncle Waffles, and 30 Years of Metalheadz. The Grade Two-listed theatre, formerly the Camden Palace, has a long and storied history; back in the Top 100 Clubs for the first time since 2008, its next chapter is proving brighter than ever. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
88	Barbarella's Discotheque	Pirovac, Croatia	3,000	thegardencroatia.com	Croatia offers a pretty non-stop programme of festivals from May until September each summer, and many of them — including Dekmantel Selectors, Defected, Dimensions and Outlook Origins — stop by the legendary Barbarella's Discotheque. It's an open-air venue nestled on the beach in Tisno surrounded by lush vegetation, and whether dancing under the hot sun or a starry night sky, it offers premium sound and sympathetic lighting that all add up to a cosy, organic and bohemian experience soundtracked by some of the best in the game. Few clubs in this list have the throwback, uncommercialised feel of this one, which is what makes it so great. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
89	EXE Club	Sofia, Bulgaria	950		execlub.bg EXE is the most dominant name in Sofia’s dance music listings, with the crew regularly drawing in just under 1,000 punters to their bunker three nights per week. A recently upgraded sound system has further improved the subterranean house and techno haunt, which is home to residents like Pavel Petrov, Peepou, Vorick and Bagerziev. Bookings over the past year have included Patrick Mason, Konstantin Sibold, SPFDJ, Joris Voorn, Sama’ Abdulhadi, Claptone, Themba and Solardo. Meanwhile, external parties, a five-day festival at coastal sister venue EXE Beach in June, and December’s 10th anniversary all betray a packed calendar at HQ and beyond. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
90	Index	Dublin, Ireland	1,200	indexdublin.com	Starting as a techno-focused brand in 2017 and operating in a small venue on Dublin’s Arran Quay, Index has since evolved into a leading platform for quality house and techno. It’s been a year of change for the club, moving to a new purpose-built space on Liberty Lane and, as a result, gaining an increased capacity and L’Acoustics sound system. Artists from Armand Van Helden to Indira Paganotto have played Index over the last 12 months, supported by a plethora of local names. Following a summer break, Index returns in September for another season of exceptional line-ups and parties. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
91	Noxx	Hanoi, Vietnam	300	instagram.com/noxxciti	It’s a first appearance in DJ Mag’s Top 100 Clubs list for former restaurant NOXX in Hanoi, Vietnam, a high-end intimate venue located in the city centre. Fully decked out with an EDM-festival-style cyberpunk DJ booth, a formidable d&b Audiotechnik sound system and space-age laser lighting rig/LED screens, NOXX employs two resident DJ duos: Vietnam’s Gaztik and Not Afraid. Over the last 12 months, the club’s played host to DJs including Solarstone, Sound Rush, Blastoyz, Plastik Funk and Revive, making a strong start in its campaign “to become the finest EDM clubs in Vietnam”. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
92	Cromie Disco	Castellaneta, Italy	3,000		cromiedisco.it There’s something about Italian clubs and Italian clubbers that sets them apart from the rest of us. Stylish as they come, decadent to the max, and full of bright ideas to make a night out an experience to cherish. CROMIE DISCO has been doing it like this for over 20 years or so. And it’s in part the club’s circular dancefloor that welcomes everyone together and makes for an extra special time. Built on an ancient amphitheatre, the tone is set. And with Loco Dice, Indira Paganotto, Marco Carola and Ilario Alicante amongst the headliners playing there, it’s small wonder to see CROMIE DISCO in the Top 100 Clubs once again in 2024. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
93	Rebel	Toronto, Canada	3,900	rebeltoronto.com	A new entry to the poll this year, REBEL is a huge 45,000-square-foot club and music venue located on the Polson Pier on the edge of Lake Ontario in Toronto. Originally the Docks Nightclub & Concert Theater, it launched as REBEL in 2016 after a reported $10 million renovation, and now boasts four rooms, a 65-foot stage, and a grand terrace with views of the city skyline. Guests playing at the venue include Black Coffee, CamelPhat, MK, Claude VonStroke, John Digweed, Meduza, i_o, Green Velvet, Illenium, and Cosmic Gate, while production is led by Adam Hummel, who took care of art direction and motion design for Beyoncé’s Formation World Tour. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
94	Hardpop	Ciudad Juárez, Mexico	400	hardpopclub.com	Hardpop is often heralded as one of Mexico’s most respected clubbing institutions, and its return to the DJ Mag Top 100 Clubs is testament to that. “Hardpop was born in a way of seeking freedom and a place for holding a community in search of a proper club experience,” explains David Teruel, the booking and branding manager of Hardpop. Founded in 2006, the club puts international DJs alongside Mexico’s homegrown talent, and has built a dedicated fanbase. In the past year it hosted Carl Craig, Kobosil, Magda, Stacey Pullen and Chloé Caillet to name a few, and continued to improve the clubbing experience with upgrades to the Danley Sound Labs audio setup and a brand new LED lighting system. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
95	Shelter	Amsterdam, The Netherlands	1,100		shelteramsterdam.nl A custom-built venue deep in the foundations of North Amsterdam’s A’DAM Tower, Shelter has become a firm favourite of the Dutch capital’s thriving scene, but still opted to switch things up with a major refurb this year. The Funktion-One-powered main room now has LED panels all over the ceiling to create a “dynamic, visual environment,” marketing manager Stacey van Heeringen tells us, plus there’s now extra space on the dancefloor and a new space called RESTROOM. The club also has all-new branding, and new events series in partnership with Seth Troxler, AMÉMÉ, Prunk and more, with a focus on house in all its forms, Italo disco, and a spot of techno for good measure. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
96	New City Gas	Montréal, Canada	670	newcitygas.com	Industrial warehouse venue, New City Gas, used to be home to a gas lighting company of the same name, responsible for lighting up the streets of Montréal in the 19th century. Nowadays it’s promoters like DSTRKT and Nuits Bazart that bring the spark, booking some of the world’s biggest EDM DJs to rattle the building’s red brick walls every weekend. DVLM, Alok and Lost Frequencies have been highlights over the past year — with Don Diablo and Eli Brown already lined up for 2024. Nuits Bazart, on the other hand, offers a more nuanced experience, pairing fine dining with a side order of sumptuous beats. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
97	Spazio 900	Rome, Italy	2,000		spazionovecento.it Situated in EUR, the business district of Rome, Spazio Novecento is a captivating building surrounded by imposing white marble colonnades. It may sound an unlikely place to find a club, but then promoters NEON have made transforming historic buildings their trademark, juxtaposing this history with state-of-the-art sound and visuals. With the venue’s temple-like grandness lit up by banks of lights and lasers, ravers come to worship. The likes of Funk Tribu and Cristobal Pescer provide a soundtrack that stretches from tech-house through hard techno to rolling psytrance.  Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
98	And Club	Johannesburg, South Africa	600		andclub.co.za And Club has humble beginnings — techno weekly TOY TOY needed a space, and found one in the second dancefloor of Johannesburg rave institution Carfax. Sectioning this off as a separate venue, the party turns 13 this September and remains the flagship of an address also known for gqom, deep house and drum & bass. Boasting a meaty Void rig inside, and a vintage Meyer system in the garden, bookings are equally uncompromising. DVS1, Freddy K, Jennifer Cardini, Sandrien, Setoac Mass, Dasha Rush, Truncate, and Volvox joined ressies Dogstarr, Fabio, Black Lake, Illing, Gforce, Bonging Zulu, and Terry Aronis in the past year. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
99	Octava	Bogotá, Colombia	750	octavaclub.com	Located in Colombia’s capital within the lively Chapinero district, Octava was founded nine years ago with a mission to “create a vibrant hub that would elevate the electronic music scene in our city to new heights,” explains José Russo, CMCO and bookings director of the club. In the last 12 months, the space has been completely renovated, including fitting a new sound system and hi-res LED screen on the main floor. As well as booking international talent — from Roger Sanchez to Lee Burridge — the club celebrates local artists, with a roster of 13 resident DJs. This year, Octava will be announcing branded showcases across many other cities. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
100	La Feria	Santiago, Chile	400	clublaferia.com	If you've heard of one club in Chile it will undoubtedly be La Feria, a now-25-year-old venue that was once a large house in a bohemian neighbourhood. These days it is a hotbed of electronic music activity that boasts a Funktion-One sound system and sleek visual edge designed by Mexican designer Exme. In the last year, the club — which is run entirely on recycled energy — has opened a new space next to the main room that focuses on new local talent, while international guests have included the Martinez Brothers, Paco Osuna and Carl Cox. Thrust Publishing Ltd, Unit 3, 30-40 Underwood Street, London, N1 7JQ, United Kingdom.
